Authors
Manavendra K. Thakur
Number of Reviews
22

Title
Review for Hope and Glory (1987)
Cast: Sebastian Rice Edwards, Geraldine Muir, Sarah Miles, David Hayman, Sammi
Davis, Derrick O' Connor, Susan Wooldridge, Jean-Marc Barr, Ian Bannen, Annie
Leon, Jill Baker, Amelda Brown, Katrine Boorman, Colin Higgins, Shelagh Fraser,
Gerald James, Barbara Pierson, Nicky Taylor, Jodie Andrews, Nicholas Askew,
Jamie Bowman, Colin Dale, David Parkin, Carlton Taylor, Sarah Langton, Imogen
Cawrse, Susan Brown, Charley Boorman, Peter Hughes, Ann Thornton, Andrew
Bicknell, Christine Crowshaw, William Armstrong, and Arthur Cox.
Credits: Written, Produced, and Directed by John Boorman. Co-Producer: Michael
Dryhurst. Executive Producers: Jake Eberts and Edgar F. Gross.  Director of
Photography: Phillippe Rousselot. Production Designer: Anthony Pratt. Costume
Designer: Shirley Russell. Editor: Ian Crawford. Sound Editor: Ron Davis.
Original Music Composed, Arranged, and Conducted by Peter Martin. Art Director:
Don Dossett.
     "John Boorman."  The name brings back some of his great thrillers from the
past: POINT BLANK, DELIVERANCE, EXCALIBUR.  The last thing one would expect
from a director of such grand mythic adventures would be a cheerful, humorous,
and quirky recreation of childhood memories of London during World War II.  And
yet, that's exactly what John Boorman has done with HOPE AND GLORY.  It's a
delightful film that is thoroughly entertaining because it draws richly, and
quite paradoxically, from its seemingly serious subject matter.
     The question that underlies most of HOPE AND GLORY is how to respond to
periods of great despair and tribulation.  One can take refuge in the
banalities of housecleaning like Tevye's wife in FIDDLER ON THE ROOF, one can
retreat behind a self-created emotional wall like Pink in PINK FLOYD--THE WALL,
or one can respond in any of a multitude of other ways.  War is perhaps the
worse creator of misery, and it directly invokes the question of how the human
spirit survives its pressures.  Many films have depicted the horror of war as
well as grand myths of heroic efforts and noble sacrifices of soldiers who
fought them.  War has also been examined from a child's perspective in great
films such as FORBIDDEN GAMES and THE NIGHT OF THE SHOOTING STARS.
     Boorman's film transcends all of them through its casual debunking of the
sentimental myths surrounding war-torn England in its darkest hour.  But while
all the other films focused on the tragedy of war, Boorman shows the comedy of
it.  The beauty of HOPE AND GLORY is that its satire is so deeply submerged
beneath the film's truly funny and nostalgic story that it is unapparent on
casual viewing.  That sort of subtlety is rare in current cinema and is what
makes HOPE AND GLORY a true classic.
     The film is about 7-year-old Billy Rohan (Sebastian Rice Edwards, in his
acting debut) and his family as they weather nightly bomb runs of the
Luftwaffe.  The very first night of the bombing, Billy and his 16-year-old
sister Dawn (Sammi Davis) rush out, surprisingly enough, to dance in their
front yard under the bomb flashes.  The next day, Billy begins his prized
shrapnel collection as he makes his way to school.  At school, he and his
younger sister Sue (Geraldine Muir) are bombarded with patriotic songs and
speeches from the schoolteachers, who are every bit as nasty as the teachers in
PINK FLOYD--THE WALL, and indeed portions of Billy's neighborhood resemble the
Alien Landscape in which young Pink wanders.  But the overpowering tyranny that
Pink succumbs to in that film simply bounces off the youthful resiliency of
Billy and Sue, even when they are forced to recite multiplication tables while
wearing gas masks in a shelter during an air raid.
     Their response to the war in general is very much like that of many MIT
students last year when Hurricane Gloria brushed Boston: "If it causes damage,
I can't do anything about it, so let's have fun!"  Billy joins a new gang (he's
initiated into it by learning new swear words) which rummages inside the ruins
of bombed houses, smashing already broken windows and furniture.  When Dawn
hears Neville Chamberlain's announcement of war on the radio, she exclaims that
the war isn't her fault and that she still needs her stockings that she's
looking for.  Their attitude is not one of crass materialistic infatuation but
one of focus on the immediate relevancy of the here and now.  The war simply
gives Billy and the other kids new games and toys to play with as they go on
living life their own way.  Danger is present everywhere around them, yet they
recognize it and absorb it in a uniquely childlike manner which few, if any, of
the adults possess.
     Nonetheless, the characterizations of the adults is just as rich as that
of the children.  The entire film is a three-dimensional portrait of Billy's
family, and each character's screentime is used to the fullest.  Billy's mother
Grace, his father Clive, his three aunts, his Grandma, and grandfather George
are all fully developed human characters, and there is not a single bad
performance among the actors who portray them.
     More importantly, they all are seen through Billy's eyes as he remembers
them, which means that he sees individual eccentricities that he (and therefore
the audience) finds most interesting.  It's difficult to forget Billy's
expression of disgust at being repeatedly kissed on the cheek by his mother and
aunts, or his toothy grin as he playfully tells his grandfather, who had just
completely missed shooting a field rat, that the rat was limping as it walked
away.  It is because the characters and plot develop through seemingly banal
scenes as these that the film is so disarming.  Savage insults worthy of Luis
Bunuel or Jonathan Swift are completely absent.  In their place is a much more
gentle and smooth story that depends as much on what is not shown as well as
the scenes that are.  The nonstop comedic moments tend to make even that
sub-satire virtually unnoticeable, and yet it is there for those who wish to see
it.
     One particularly good example of that sub-satire occurs early in the first
half of the film, which concentrates on Billy and his family's reactions to the
initial declaration of war.  Billy's father Clive (David Hayman) interrupts his
horsing around with Billy to reveal that he has joined the military.  After his
announcement, he motions for Billy to lean towards him so he can convey an
important message.  At this moment, the audience inwardly groans because it
expects a tiresome speech from Clive about how Billy is now going to be the man
in the house, how Billy must now grow up and shoulder more responsibility.  But
no, that's not what Clive does at all.  He instead teaches Billy how to throw a
googly to confuse the batter in a game of cricket, and he conveys it as a
family secret!  Although this is one of the more obvious moments, the film is
rife with similar instances where Boorman twists conventional expectations such
that the comedic results can be interpreted to whatever depth the viewer
chooses.  The deeper levels of anti-heroism are there, but the shallower strata
of simple action and humor provide more than sufficient satisfaction.
     Billy's grandfather George (Ian Bannen) dominates the film's second half,
and rightly so because he becomes the most influential person in Billy's life
after an ordinary fire (of all things!) burns down Billy's house, forcing the
Rohans to move to George's riverside country home far from the turmoil of
London.  Although he continually comes across as a cantankerous, semi-senile
old man -- he is first seen early in the film drunkenly toasting all the women
he's ever slept with -- his humanity shines through after Billy's old school is
destroyed by a stray bomb.  George and Billy laugh all the way back to the
countryside, gleeful at Billy's respite from school.  George begins to spend a
great deal of time with Billy, teaching him how to row, playing cricket with
him, and telling stories.  Billy is far more endeared to his grandfather's
piqued muttering and mean jokes than his aunts' romanticizing or his sister's
tears when her newly found Canadian lover is stationed elsewhere.
     Although the film's sharp division between the males and the females would
be considered sexist today, the film doesn't harp on that because it's not a
political film.  Boorman simply portrays idyllic country life as he remembers
it -- complete with beautiful and lushly green scenery that belies the urgency
and tension usually associated with war.  Ian Bannen's performance as George is
so magnificent that George's personality overpowers and disarms whatever
notions the audience takes with it inside the theater.  Much like the crusty
old men in TRAVELLING NORTH (Leo McKern) and A MIDSUMMER'S NIGHT SEX COMEDY
(Max Von Sydow), George and his saucy ways are forgivable, especially since
the film portrays him not from any current context but as Billy sees him, with
his childlike perspective of 1940s England.
     That perspective is well depicted through superb technical production
values.  In one of many similar strokes of genius, the film's editing by Ian
Crafford conveys Billy's feelings to the audience by depicting the Rohan's
burning house for what seems an eternity, yet only showing the bombed school
building for a few fleeting seconds.  The creation of the Rohans residence and
street by Production Designer Anthony Pratt and Art Director Don Dossett is
thoroughly convincing, and Phillippe Rousselot's camerawork demonstrates a
perceptive and guiding intelligence, especially when the camera pans in very
tightly on the small toy soldiers Billy plays with on his front lawn, making
the green grass seem almost like a jungle and the figurines somehow mythically
alive.  And later in the film when a barrage balloon breaks free, the camera
lovingly makes it seem a joyful and wonderous event rather than the accidental
mishap it actually is.  With the exception of some extremely sappy music by
Peter Martin, each individual technical detail -- the costumes, lighting, hair
styles, etc. -- coalesce together so well that the crew's work seems
completely natural and at ease with themselves, the actors, and the audience.
     And in that fusion one must not forget the unifying hand of John Boorman.
Children have an uncanny ability to see events unhindered by social and
cultural baggage -- to see their immediate importance -- and Boorman's film
captures that beautifully, from the wonder and the pity to the tears and humor.
The children are not cute little tykes completely oblivious to their
surroundings, like the small children in Juzo Itami's THE FUNERAL.  Billy and
the other children in HOPE AND GLORY are perceptive enough to see the effects
of the war, but they are go-happy enough not to be too bothered by it.  The
depth of Boorman's portrayal of these children, as well as the other
characters, is one that can only come from cherished and heartfelt personal
memories.
     HOPE AND GLORY is Boorman's second film that he has written, produced, and
directed (the first was ZARDOZ).  This time the results of his efforts
represent the maturation of his filmmaking abilities, the extension and
completion of John Boorman as film director and auteur.  HOPE AND GLORY is his
personal masterpiece, and film historians will no doubt add it to the list of
films that achieve near artistic perfection through their subtlety, insight,
and multi-layered depth -- films like ANNIE HALL, THE SEVEN SAMURAI, RULES OF
THE GAME, and THE GENERAL.  For filmgoers now, however, it is a sheer joy to
see Boorman's work on the screen, with all its humor and intelligence.

Title
Review for Au revoir les enfants (1987)
Cast: Gaspard Manesse, Raphael Fejto, Francine Racette, Stanislas Carre de
Malberg, Philippe Morier-Genoud, Francois Berleand, Francois Negret, Peter Fitz,
Pascal Rivet, Benoit Henriet, Richard Leboeuf, Xavier Legrand, Arnaud Henriet,
Jean-Sebastian Chauvin, Luc Etienne, Daniel Edinger, Marcel Bellot, Ami Flammer,
Irene Jacob, Jean-Paul Dubarry, Jacqueline Staup, Jacqueline Paris.
Credits: Written, Produced, and Directed by Louis Malle. Associate Producer:
Christian Ferry. Cinematography: Renato Berta. Art Direction: Willy Holt.
Costume Designer: Corinne Jorry. Sound: Jean-Claude Laureux. Editor: Emmanuelle
Castro. Production Manager: Gerald Molto. Music: Schubert--Moment Musical No. 2;
Saint-Saens--Rondo Capricioso. (Violin: Ami Flammer; Piano: J. F. Heisser.)
     Every detail of the events on January 15, 1944, has become etched into
Louis Malle's memory.  On that tragic day, an 11-year-old Louis Malle and his
fellow students in a Catholic school fifty miles south of Paris watched as the
local Gestapo chieftain arrested three of their Jewish classmates along with
Father Jacques, the school's headmaster who had hidden the Jewish boys for over
a year.
     Now, more than forty years later after the Nazis sent the four to their
deaths, Louis Malle shares this most intimate and troubling memory of his
childhood in his newest film, AU REVOIR LES ENFANTES (GOODBYE, CHILDREN),
which he wrote, produced, and directed.  No other filmmaker in recent memory
has bared his or her soul to the bone more movingly and more convincingly than
Louis Malle has done in this film.  By focusing his film only on the specific
events he witnessed that led up to that fateful day, Louis Malle's film becomes
the rarest of rarities: a film that is intensely personal and deeply moving,
yet does not degenerate into vacuous melodrama or political polemic.  The
simple and unrelenting honesty of his film transforms Louis Malle's personal
catharsis into an experience of universal and profoundly human dimensions.
     Literally, the title refers to the farewell that Father Jacques (renamed
Father Jean in the film) utters to the students as he's being led away by the
Germans, but metaphorically it heralds the end of Louis Malle's own childhood
innocence.  Through the eyes of Julien Quentin (Gaspard Manesse), Louis Malle
depicts his introduction to the harsh realities from which his upper-middle
class background had sheltered him.  The loss of innocence begins in the very
first scene as Julien prepares to board the train that will take him to the
school.  He can't stand the thought of leaving Paris, and he tells his mother
that he hates her for making him go.  Her response is to hug and kiss him.  It
is a poignant moment, but Julien's outburst points to the tensions that have
already been created within him by the war, tensions that will develop and
express themselves later.
     From there, the film shifts to the school itself, where Julien forgets
about the outside world and goes about being a studious and playful seventh
grader.  He reads novels after hours with a flashlight, plays pranks on other
children, and cavorts on stilts in the schoolyard during recess.  During these
scenes, Louis Malle creates an almost perfect aura of boarding school life,
complete with the children's token adherence to religious rituals and gripes
about the food being good only when parents come to visit.  By relying on the
natural responses of his young actors, Malle captures youthful bravados and
mannerisms with the same astounding resonance of Francois Truffaut's THE 400
BLOWS, and indeed a scene of the schoolchildren marching through the streets
creates a powerful sense of deja vu.
     What primarily distinguishes Louis Malle's depiction from the spate of
recent coming-of-age films, however, is that Julien is neither a child claiming
to be an adult nor an adult pretending to be a child.  When the three young
boys arrive at the school, one of them, Jean Bonnet (Raphael Fejto) is assigned
the bed next to Julien's.  Julien acts just as a typical tough kid would: he
introduces himself by saying "I'm Julien.  Don't mess with me."  But while he
joins in the boys' pranks and teasing, Julien also finds himself intrigued by
the quiet, reserved manner in which Jean bears all the abuse.  Little by
little, a shaky friendship with numerous ups and downs develops between them.
Their friendship becomes cemented when the two find themselves lost in the
woods as they search for a treasure during a scouting game.  Frightened and
cold, they are found on a highway by three soldiers on patrol in a jeep, who
return them to the school.  What Julien can't understand is why Jean tried to
run when he realized that the soldiers were German.  After Julien discovers
that Jean's real last name is Kippelstein, he eventually realizes that Jean is
Jewish -- but even then has to ask his brother what it means to be Jewish.
Julien is now at a seminal point in his maturity, where he cradles an already
emerging adult awareness with his yet potent youthful exuberance.
     Louis Malle's heartfelt construction of this child/adult balance is at the
core of the film's success.  By the end of the film, the viewer does not merely
sympathize with the two boys as the Gestapo make their arrests at the school.
Rather, the audience empathizes so thoroughly with the two boys' experience
that their ordeal becomes the viewer's as well.  The film's final shots convey
the full emotional weight of the bond between Julien and Jean that has been so
sharply cut, but those shots do not degenerate into tearjerker sentiment
because the audience feels the hurt caused by the arbitrariness and extent of
the Nazi's evil as though it had been aimed personally against the viewer.  Few
films manage to link its characters with the audience so closely as Malle's
convincing and even-handed portrayal of the array of human weaknesses and
strengths.
     And Malle gives the film a tremendous thematic scope to the film as well
as depth, which contributes further to Julien's loss of innocence.  Joseph
(Francois Negret), an orphan who works in the school's kitchen, runs a black
market where the children can trade their food from home for cigarettes and
dirty books.  When the scam is discovered, Joseph is fired while the students
who collaborated with him are merely reprimanded due to their family prestige.
Joseph repays this acknowledged injustice by the same act that Louis Malle
explored in his 1974 film LACOMBE LUCIEN, and it is just as inexplicable and
appropriate here as it was in that film.  Julien cannot believe his eyes when
he discovers what his friend has done.
     In another scene, Jean Bonnet joins Julien and his family for a Sunday
lunch outing.  While they are eating, two French militiamen enter and begin to
harass an elderly distinguished gentleman who is in the restaurant illegally.
While most of the patrons grumble some support for the gentleman, it is none
other than a Nazi officer who seizes the initiative and throws the militiamen
out.  The enormous moral implications about the acquiescence to evil begin to
dawn on Julien (and the audience) when a surprised diner's exclamation that not
all Germans are bad is immediately followed by a cynical comment that the Nazi
officer was really just grandstanding in front of Julien's attractive mother.
Jean, meanwhile, remains still as a mouse; he's seen it all before, and he
displays virtually no sign of how quietly desperate his life has become.
     It is through repeated scenes such as these that Louis Malle establishes
unique and moral complexities within which Julien comes of age.  Watching
Julien explore these contradictions is never tiresome -- even though the
audience knows in advance the inevitable outcome -- because of the natural and
believable ensemble performances.  Louis Malle likes to work with inexperienced
young actors, and in this film, he draws upon their natural inclinations and
reactions so masterfully that the distinction between actor and character is
erased.  Louis Malle's film creates not a flat stage for the actors to work on,
but rather a fully articulated and three-dimensional world for the characters
to inhabit and live in.  The balance between the narrative and its context is
impeccable.
     It is quite fortunate that Louis Malle waited all these years to make this
film because the perspective gained from that experience enabled him to
crystallize all his humanity and all his filmmaking skills into a solid film
that defies trivialization or dismissal.  And because he has fictionalized
certain scenes and details while remaining thoroughly true to what he calls
"the most tragic memory of my childhood," his film involves the audience in a
manner that no documentary or polemic could hope to equal.  Louis Malle has
shown that despite the staggering amount that has been written already, there
yet remains much to say and remember about the horrors of the Nazi era.  One
has to return to THE GRAND ILLUSION, THE SEVEN SAMURAI, and the films of Ingmar
Bergman and Satyajit Ray to find similarly moving portraits of the human
condition.  A film like AU REVOIR LES ENFANTES arrives only rarely, a precious
event that will be remembered for years to come by those who witness its birth.

Title
Review for Glass Menagerie, The (1987)
Cast: Joanne Woodward, John Malkovich, Karen Allen, and James Naughton.
Credits:  Playwright: Tennessee Williams.  Original Music by Henry Mancini.
Editor: David Ray.  Production Design and Costumes: Tony Walton.  Director of
Photography: Michael Ballhaus.  Produced by Burtt Harris.  Directed by Paul
Newman.  Sound: Nat Boxer.  Art Director: John Kasarda.  Set Decorator: Susan
Bode.
     In 1945, Tennessee Williams created a sensation when THE GLASS MENAGERIE,
his first play, appeared on Broadway.  Since then, the play has been made into
film on occasions in the past, with Irving Rapper's 1950 version being the
worst.  In 1986, Paul Newman saw Joanne Woodward and Karen Allen act in the
play on stage at the Williamstown Theatre Festival and decided that "it would
be shameful not to have a permanent record of their performance."  Well aware
of the respect accorded to William's most autobiographical and poetic play,
Paul Newman set out to give it a definitive treatment on film.  He even went so
far as to declare that he "wouldn't have to hire a screenwriter because I would
be faithful to Tennessee."  While his version does respect William's
intentions, it unfortunately isn't the permanent reproduction Newman wants it
to be.  Paul Newman's experience as an actor aids him considerably in eliciting
good performances, but it is in his camerawork that he falters -- ever the bane
of translating stage plays to film.
     Joanne Woodward stars in the pivotal role of Amanda, the mother who tries
to make her crippled and plain daughter Laura into the dream figure she desired
for herself.  Woodward's acting is excellent and quite convincing throughout
the film.  Her best scene is perhaps near the end of the film as Jim, Laura's
Gentleman Caller prepares to leave the apartment.  Seeing all her efforts
wither away, Woodward evokes a mournful sadness that resonates tremendously
without degenerating to melodramatic excess.  In other scenes as well, such as
the "Deception!" speech and the magazine subscription telephone monologues,
Woodward's performance comes closest to reaching the full potential of
Williams' lines.
     Karen Allen proves in her performance as Laura that she can indeed handle
film roles more demanding than RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK.  Serious acting is
called for in this film, and serious acting is what she provides.  Laura is a
very intimate and shy woman, handicapped mentally by her physical ailment.
Allen effectively plays Laura as an intimate and shy woman, who's handicapped
mentally by her physical ailment.  The way her eyes sparkle and come alive
while talking about her prized collection of glass animal figurines round out
Allen's evocative performance, meeting the complexity Williams wrote into
Laura's character.
     The two men in the film do not fare nearly as well.  James Noughton gives
a solid but uninteresting performance as the Gentleman Caller.  Noughton
depicts Jim's past glory adequately, but he fails to shine while trying to coax
Laura out of her shell.  As idiotic as the 1950 version was, Kirk Douglas was
much more inspiring than Noughton is here.  However, the source material may be
the cause of this, as much has been made by critics over the years of Williams'
typically uninteresting male characters.  Given his character's limitations,
Noughton succeeds with his performance, especially when Jim realizes he has
gone too far with Laura.
     John Malkovich does not deserve any such benefit of the doubt.  He
replaces John Sayles' work on stage as Laura's brother Tom, and his "newcomer"
status shows.  He virtually reads out loud the famous opening monologue,
rendering it a dull and listless speech without much conviction.  He sparks
little chemistry between himself and the other three actors, and even his
expressions of love for Karen -- a central and important theme of the play --
seem almost forced and unconvincing.  After lagging for most of the film, his
best moment undoubtedly comes as he pours forth his anguish in the closing
monologue at leaving his sister, where he improves dramatically (no pun
intended) to meet Williams' powerful poetic demands.  It is surprising that
Malkovich would give such an uninspired performance because his acting has
usually been quite good, especially in THE KILLING FIELDS and the current
EMPIRE OF THE SUN.  It is unfortunate that John Sayles was not available for
the role.
     Similarly, it is unfortunate that Newman's camerawork calls too much
attention to itself.  For example, he badly misuses close ups by rapidly
cutting from Karen to Jim when they first are left alone after dinner.  This
kinetic editing was probably introduced to spice up the somewhat slow dialogue,
but it actually results in unnecessary and disorienting complications that
detract from the content being conveyed.  Newman partially redeems this scene
by emphasizing psychological distance by placing his individual characters on
the extreme edges of the 1.85 frame, but using the wider shape of the 2.35
(CinemaScope) frame would have been one possible way to accomplish the same
result without resorting to choppy editing between facial closeups.
     In other scenes, Newman excessively moves his camera around characters and
even behind irrelevant objects such as a lamp.  Tom is given his own bedroom
for what seems no other reason than to give Newman another room to shoot in.
In one sequence, the camera voyeuristically peers into the living room through
the crack between two partially closed curtains -- but then moves *through* the
crack, pans around some characters and objects, and then shows the crack again
from inside the living room.  It's almost as if the camera were congratulating
itself for having flawlessly executed such difficult movement in one continuous
take.  And on at least one occasion, the camera suddenly lurches forward for a
split second before resuming a smoother and even pan.  Such devices uniquely
belong to film, and bold new applications of older techniques is one of many
major avenues to advance the state of any art form.  Given that, perhaps it
could have been possible for cinematographer Michael Ballhaus and Newman to
successfully integrate stylistic elements of AFTER HOURS or some of Ranier
Werner Fassbinder's films (many of which Ballhaus shot), but unfortunately that
is not the case here as their efforts distract rather than present Williams'
play in a new and interesting way.  Newman's deliberate emphasis on the filmic
nature of his version comes at the expense of his sincere intention to remain
faithful to Williams.
     Worse yet, continuity between shots is at times surprisingly shoddy,
especially for such a high class production as this one.  In one scene, Karen's
arms are folded akimbo in front of her whereas they are crossed behind her back
in the very next shot when her reflection is seen in a mirror.  Then she is
again shown with arms folded in front as the next shot's point of view shifts
back to her directly.  Similarly, a changeover from one reel to another brings
on an instantaneous brightening of the apartment's lighting, with no
explanation or indication of why Karen and Jim's intimate candlelight
conversation suddenly finds itself illuminated by a floor-level spotlight.  The
change is much too drastic to be explained by laboratory processing errors or
other such possibilities.  These discrepancies arise from either a serious
misunderstanding of filmic fundamentals or from an inattention to detail
unworthy of Williams' brilliance.  These are most certainly small and nitpicky
details, yet one would expect that a filmmaker who intended to create a
definitive filmic recreation of such a famous play would take the necessary
care to avoid such blatantly distracting maneuvers -- especially when previous
attempts to bring the play to the screen have failed miserably.
     The film's other technical aspects do work well, however, and do in fact
display the careful attention to detail worthy of a labor of love missing in
the camerawork and continuity.  The mood of the film established by its set
design and lighting is properly somber, with embellishments like fancy costumes
and occasional lively music by Henry Mancini creating the aura of contrived yet
entirely appropriate elegance.  Each wall has been designed separately, and
much thought has obviously gone into the decorations and furnishings.  And
surprisingly enough, Newman does display one brilliant inspiration in his
camerawork.  It comes as Tom laments to himself while leaving the living room
that no one had ever escaped from his neighborhood's economic and psychological
doldrums.  The vacuum in the cinematic frame created by Tom's exit is then
smoothly filled by the well-lit portrait of Tom's father hung on the
mantlepiece that just comes into view on the right edge of the screen.  The
point, of course, is that Tom's father was the only one who did make it out,
although at great cost to himself and his family.  Contrasted to Rapper's 1950
version, where Tom drunkenly bellows "Except you!" while glaring at the
portrait, Newman conveys the scene's essence by using cinematic techniques with
supreme subtlety and grace.  If only Newman had done the same in the remainder
of the film, his version could have been the masterpiece he so wanted it to be.
     THE GLASS MENAGERIE is a brilliant play from a brilliant playwright, and
that is something difficult to disguise, no matter how poorly translated or
mutilated.  There is no doubt that Paul Newman's intentions and sincerity were
true and sound, and he is to be commended for bringing the fine acting of three
actors of the Williamstown stage to the world.  Modern audiences will enjoy the
pleasures that do exist in the film (which are considerable indeed).  But those
pleasures stem mainly from Tennessee Williams' words and the actors who bring
those words to life.  It seems clear that Paul Newman's technical direction is
the weakest element in the film.
Directorial Filmography of Paul Newman:
Paul Newman has been acting in films like THE HUSTLER, THE TORN CURTAIN, BUTCH
CASSIDY AND THE SUNDANCE KID, THE STING, ABSENCE OF MALICE, and THE VERDICT for
over 25 years, and he won the Best Actor Oscar last year for THE COLOR OF
MONEY.  He is active in many social and political causes and manages to find
time to engage in his favorite hobby, race car driving.  He has been married to
Joanne Woodward since 1958.

Title
Review for Marusa no onna (1987)
Cast: Nobuko Miyamoto, Tsutomu Yamazaki, Masahiko Tsugawa, Hideo Murota,
Shuji Otaki, Daisuke Yamashita, Shinsuke Ashida, Keiju Kobayashi, Mariko Okada,
Kiriko Shimizu, Kazuyo Matsui, Yasuo Daichi, Kinzo Sakura, Hajime Asoh,
Shiro Ito, Eitaro Ozawa.
Credits: Written and Directed by Juzo Itami.  Produced by Yasushi Tamaoki and
Seigo Hosogoe.  Director of Photography: Yonezo Maeda.  Edited by Akira Suzuki.
Music by Toshiyuki Honda.  Art Direction by Shuji Nakamura.  Lighting by
Akio Katsura.  Recording by Osamu Onodera.
     The rise of Juzo Itami has been nothing less than meteoric.  In four short
years and three films, he has become perhaps the best known Japanese film
director in the West since Akira Kurosawa.  After taking a close look at death
in OSOSHIKI [THE FUNERAL] (1984) and at sex and food in TAMPOPO (1986), he
strikes again with MARUSA NO ONNA, a film that mirrors and satirizes another
universal theme: taxes.  But the Japanese version of taxation is far removed
from what most Americans think of as taxes.  In Japan, as an opening title
points out, tax rates can be as high as 80%, and consequently people of all
economic backgrounds cheat on their taxes as a matter of routine.  And the
lengths to which the national tax police, Marusa, goes to enforce the tax laws
make IRS tactics seem like peaches and cream in comparison.
     Itami says he "became interested in taxes after almost all the earnings
from OSOSHIKI had been snatched away as income tax."  Accordingly, he decided
to make a film about how Marusa operates and decided to use the stars of his
first two films in his latest film.  Nobuko Miyamoto plays the lead role of
Ryoko Itakura, a freckled and ambitious tax inspector who singlemindedly works
her way up from mom and pop grocers to the big-time real estate tycoons and
"love hotel" (adult hotels) owners.  She tries early on to audit one such big
fish, Hideki Gondo (Tsutomu Yamazaki), whose skill at hiding his income is more
than a match for her limited authority as an auditor.  So the film skips
forward about six months or so when Ryoko is promoted to a full-fledged tax
inspector.  And that's when the real fun begins.
     The comedic moments stem mostly from the extraordinary measures that
citizens use to cheat on their taxes.  To the Japanese shown in the film,
nothing is sacred in the pursuit of another yen.  They make false loans to
friends, bribe politicians, and even bury cash in jars containing ashes of the
dead.  One woman tries to swallow an incriminating document as the tax
collectors close in.  (They have to hold her nose shut in order to force her
mouth open.)  It's all a huge game, and everyone takes part, from the servants
to the wives and mistresses.  As one video arcade owner comments after his
tears win him a slight reprieve from Ryoko, "I'd cry all day to save a
million."
     What's also remarkable is the equally relentless drive of the tax agents
to ferret out the hidden incomes and exaggerated expenses.  The tax inspectors
are legally sanctioned Mission Impossible types who employ extensive command
centers to coordinate raids, stay on duty for three or four days at a stretch,
and use all sorts of high-tech surveillance techniques to glean their targets'
real income.  Typical of their thoroughness is a scene in which an agent sticks
his foot in the doorway to keep Gondo's mistress from slamming shut the door.
After she starts beating on his shoe with a heavy object, he casually says,
"Ma'am, they're safety shoes, used in a factory.  Even a truck couldn't crush
them!"
     But on a more serious level, nothing seems to be sacred to these
inspectors.  On one of Ryoko's first assignments as inspector, the agents
strongly suspect a woman of having hidden a safe-deposit box key within her
bra.  They ask Ryoko to search her, but the woman takes off her clothes, leans
backwards, and cries "Women have another hiding place.  Don't you want to
search it too?"  Of course, the woman is overacting to play on the agents'
sympathies, but the point is that if Ryoko hadn't just then found the key under
the kitchen sink, the agents probably would have indeed searched her body
thoroughly.  Itami's satire is rooted in showing how easily both officials and
citizens tacitly agree to transgress social and privacy limits for the sake of
money.
     Because everyone is probably guilty, most investigations in the film turn
out similarly.  It's not until the very last scene -- appropriately filmed at
the top of an empty stadium overlooking the city -- that Ryoko and Gondo step
back to take the longer view of the tax rat-race.  Itami ends the scene and the
film with a modern-day variant of the classic tradition of hara-kiri, making it
especially poignant and appropriate to the Japan of today.
     Itami's cinematic realization of his script is most noteworthy for the
excellent acting by both Miyamoto (Itami's wife in real life) and Yamazaki.
Their performances are much more Western than in either of Itami's previous
films.  In fact, Miyamoto told The New York Times that because "The few women
inspectors in Japan do not behave like [Ryoko] ...  I had to look to
Americans," and specifically Peter Falk's Columbo, for inspiration.  The stars'
acting makes up for the annoyingly inconsistent shot composition by Itami and
cinematographer Yonezo Maeda, who either have forgotten how to look through the
camera's viewfinder or just can't make up their minds whether to shoot in 1.33
or 1.66 aspect ratio.  Other technical production values are better to good,
but none particularly stand out, even upon a second viewing.
     Ultimately, Itami's film most resembles American films like BROADCAST
NEWS.  Both have round and interesting characters, both are roughly equal in
entertainment value, both explore themes (taxes, television news) that resonate
deeply with their respective societies, and both are more witty than full of
belly-laughs.  (MARUSA NO ONNA, however, was far more successful in its native
country.  It swept the Japanese Academy Awards and became the fourth highest
grossing film in Japan in 1987.)  MARUSA NO ONNA isn't a great film, from
either the standpoint of comedy or cinematic accomplishment.  It doesn't, for
example, equal Itami's success with OSOSHIKI, which remains his best work to
date.  But Itami's latest offering does confirm his reign among Japanese
filmmakers known in the West as the director most in tune with contemporary
social realities.  His willingness to explore and criticize those realities is
at the heart of his film's success.
Directorial filmography of Juzo Itami:
Juzo Itami, 56 years old, is the son of Mansaku Itami, an early Japanese film
director.  Initially a commercial artist, Juzo Itami became an actor and
appeared in films directed by Nicolas Ray, Richard Brooks, Kon Ichikawa, and
Yoshimitsu Morita, and others.  Itami decided to become a director at age 50
because he became too "impatient" waiting for good acting roles.

Title
Review for Mélo (1986)
Cast: Sabine Azema, Fanny Ardant, Pierre Arditi, Andre Dussollier,
Jacques Dacqmine, Hubert Gignoux, Catherine Arditi.
Credits: Directed by Alain Resnais.  Produced by Marin Karmitz.  From the play
by Henry Bernstein.  Camera: Charlie Van Damme & Gilbert Duhalde.  Music by
Philippe Gerard.  Art Director: Jacques Saulnier.  Set decoration: Philippe
Turlure.  Costume: Catherine Leterrier.  Sound: Henri Morell & Olivier
Villette.  Editing: Albert Jurgenson & Jean-Pierre Besnard.
     As some commentators have remarked, the French cinema in recent years has
noticeably paralleled the decline of the American film industry, leaving only
pockets of vitality.  Among the French directors who have retained a serious
commitment to artistic quality is Alain Resnais, whose first feature HIROSHIMA
MON AMOUR heralded the beginning of the French New Wave in 1959.  His newest
film, MELO -- short for melodrama -- is an excellent filmic adaptation of the
1929 play by Henry Bernstein.  It also demonstates why all the acclaim given to
Resnais over the years has been thoroughly deserved.
     Sabine Azema, previously seen in Bertrand Tavernier's A SUNDAY IN THE
COUNTRY, won the Best Actress Cesar (French Oscar equivalent) for her
performance as Romaine.  She is the carefree and flirtatious wife of Pierre
Belcroix (Pierre Arditi), a quiet unassuming man who is content to work as the
first violinist of of the Colonne Concert Orchestra.  One evening in June 1926,
Marcel Blanc (Andre Dussollier), one of Pierre's good friends from their
academy of music days who has become a reknowned concert violinist, comes to
dinner to Pierre's home on the outskirts of Paris.
     During the ensuing conversation, Marcel laments his inability to maintain
romantic relationships because his partners cannot provide him with the
complete trust and fidelity he needs.  Both Romaine and Pierre listen intently
to this Diogenes-like tale, but Romaine finds herself being intrigued by
Marcel's romantic lassitude, and she soon becomes his mistress.  The melodrama
begins when Marcel, who must leave for a world concert tour, makes Romaine
promise that she will wait for him to return so they can be together freely.
Conflicts that arise later between the three characters include deceit, broken
friendships, attempted murder, and suicide.
     While the plot reminds one of the kitsch of modern day soap operas, MELO
is far more intelligent due to the sophistication with which Resnais has
integrated film and stage aesthetics.  The film is organized into several acts
-- complete with curtain fall and rise -- with stylized sets and lighting that
delberately evoke theatrical artifice.  In addition, the style of acting is
that of the stage, with long soliloquies, speeches instead of conversation, and
the like.  Resnais uses these elements to explore the melodramatic aspect of
human relationships in abstract terms from a distanced perspective, rather than
with cheap sentimentality and triteness.  The opportunity to experiment in this
manner is probably what attracted Resnais to Bernstein's play.
     Within this stage production, however, Resnais leaves no doubt that he is
primarily a film director, especially in the opening dinner scene when Romaine
first meets Marcel.  The camera shows the three characters seated at an outdoor
tabel, with Marcel on the left side of the table, Pierre on the right, and
Romaine in between facing the camera.  After dinner, Marcel talks about a woman
who accompanied him to his Havana concert of Bach's 3rd Sonata.  Marcel's love
life was tragically scarred when he noticed her "making love with her eyes" to
a stranger in the audience.  This moment of perceived infidelity ruined, says
Marcel, their relationship and led to his disillusionment with romance.
     As Marcel begins to tell his story, the camera pans slowly forward towards
the table.  Always including Marcel in the frame, the camera tracks smoothly
around the table, glides past Pierre and Romaine, and comes to a halt with
Marcel's upper body in medium close-up.  As the camera is moving, the lighting
becomes more low-key, and the city sounds and cricket chirps fade away to
silence, leaving only Marcel's voice as he goes on with his story.  The camera
stays focused on Marcel for what seems to be several minutes, while Marcel
never actually looks directly into the camera.
     The result is mesmerizing.  The camera, light, and sound manipulations are
executed just slowly and smooth enough to be imperceptible.  It is not until
after Marcel's monologue ends that the viewer realizes how thoroughly
engrossing the film's depiction of Marcel's reverie is.  In this complex
mise-en-scene, Resnais fuses the respective strengths of stage and film with
such consumate skill that one forgets how fundamentally different the two
aesthetics in fact are.  This seriousness of purpose and willingness to
experiment is what distinguishes Resnais' work from the commercial mainstream.
He achieves such fascinating results because he is able to create and maintain
tensions of distant intimacy in ways that would be difficult in either medium
alone.
     Resnais has been criticized for lavishing such elaborate attention on a
play that may not deserve it.  But this ignores that Resnais is a consumate
artist.  One need only look at the film's title to recognize that Resnais
deliberately stripped the melodrama of its triteness in order to examine the
very real emotions at the heart of the play.  By rejecting the tyrannical
demands of conventional narrative and invoking his considerable technical
command, Resnais has most certainly taken a step beyond the work of Douglas
Sirk and others who have explored melodrama.  Indeed, Resnais may have created
the most ideal cinematic realization possible of an inherently melodramatic
stage play.  His adaptation is the thinking person's melodrama, a film that
eschews immediate emotional appeal without losing the ultimate impact of the
issues it raises.
Alain Resnais' accomplishment in MELO is somewhat a departure from his previous
work, but it leaves no doubt that his creative vitality has survived the
passage of almost thirty years since his first feature.  He remains among the
leading directors of French and world cinema.

Title
Review for Stand and Deliver (1987)
Cast: Edward James Olmos, Lou Diamond Phillips, Rosana de Soto, Vanessa
Marquez, Virginia Paris, Carmen Argenziano, Mark Eliot, Will Gotay, Patrick
Baca, Ingrid Oliu, Tyde Kierney, Bodie Olmos, Karla Montana, Daniel
Villarreal, Michael Goldfinger, Michael Yama, Lydia Nicole, Graham Galloway,
James Victor, Andy Garcia, Rif Hutton.
Credits: Director: Ramon Menendez.  Producer: Tom Musca.  Written by Ramon
Menendez & Tom Musca.  Executive Producer: Lindsay Law.  Music by Craig Safan.
Editor: Nancy Richardson.  Director of Photography: Tom Richmond.  Associate
Producer: Iya Labunka.  Art Director: Milo.  Costume Designer: Kathryn
Morrison.  Supervising Sound Editor: Hamilton Sterling.  Project Consultant:
Kate Long.
     The state of the American educational system has received much attention
lately, most of it negative.  STAND AND DELIVER, in contrast, is a film that
tries to paint a positive picture of hope and inspiration.  The film brings to
the screen the story of Jaime Escalante, a high school teacher in East Los
Angeles who managed to motivate and teach the intricacies of calculus to
students who hardly knew remedial arithmetic.  When he first arrived at
Garfield High, he found gym instructors teaching basic math and the halls
overrun by gangs and drug runners.  The situation was so bad that the
predominantly Latino school was in danger of losing its accreditation.  But
Escalante stayed and began to make a difference.
     The film version has toned down the influence of the gangs, eliminated the
use of armed guards during the Advanced Placement re-exam, and created
composite characters from real students.  But the film is otherwise quite
faithful to the actual events.  Edward James Olmos (Lt. Castillo in MIAMI
VICE), who plays Escalante, spent 18 hours a day for a month with the real
Escalante to observe his teaching methods and personal habits.  [See
accompanying article for an interview with Olmos.]  Olmos' hard work pays off
as he gives a rousing performance that carries the film past its weak first
half.  Fortunately, the film recovers its own feet before the end.
     Americans love a success story, and the first half goes overboard trying
to oblige.  It introduces the characters and begins to show the unorthodox
teaching methods of Escalante (like bringing a machete to class).  This half of
the film fails, though, to impart to the audience the magic that Escalante
worked in his class because of choppy editing and faulty construction.  In
depicting the positive influence Escalante began to exert, the film glosses
over how Escalante managed to calm the students down enough to listen to him in
the first place.  The way the film presents it, it seems that one day Escalante
walked into chaos and by the next day had kids all lined up ready to learn.  It
may have happened that way in real life, but the film gives only glimpses into
how Escalante achieved his remarkable successes.
     For example, one gifted young girl named Ana (Vanessa Marquez) tells
Escalante that she has to leave school in the middle of the year because her
father wants her to help in their family-owned restaurant.  Escalante visits
the father (James Victor) in his restaurant to try and convince him to let Ana
stay in the class.  Far from succeeding, however, Escalante ends up arguing
loudly with the father.  The father soon decides to throw Escalante -- and any
hope for Ana's continued education -- out of the restaurant.  But lo and
behold, the next day, there she is back in school ready to learn, with no sign
of what caused her father's remarkable change of heart.
     Another botched change-of-heart takes place with hotheaded gang member
named Angel (Lou Diamond Phillips), who has letters written on the outer side
of his fingers that read ``F-U-C-K Y-O-U'' when he brings his fists together.
Dennis Hopper's recent film COLORS was not very good, but it did at least point
out that one of the strongest reasons why youths join gangs is to feel a sense
of belonging and identity.  That film also vividly showed how the gang ethic
demands retribution against members of other gangs and those who leave or
betray the gang.  These issues should be at the top of the list of any
filmmaker who wants to show the success of a teacher in a gang-ridden high
school.
     But these issues are barely mentioned by STAND AND DELIVER.  The scene
where Angel walks away from his fellow gang members is simply that; the film
makes no attempt to examine why Angel would now accept the value of an
education when it is clear that he rejected it in the past when he joined the
gang.  Nor does the film delve into how Angel handles his ex-gang friends once
he left the gang.  The film introduces these concerns, juggles them like a hot
potato, and then drops them without providing any illumination.  It seems as
though the filmmakers did not want to discuss these matters at all but had to
to address them at least slightly to maintain a modicum of credibility.
     These examples are typical of how all the first half of the film does is
present the end results of Escalante's efforts.  By not conveying any sense of
how large the barriers the kids overcome really are, the film fails to humanize
the students and comes dangerously close to robbing their triumph of its
meaning and value to others who may be facing the same situation.  As it
stands, Escalante and his students seem to be working virtual miracles, and
that leaves little room for the audience to identify or cheer for the
characters, since they will win out anyway.  For a film that wants to be
inspirational, this can be quite fatal.
     Fortunately for the film, the first half does succeed in setting the stage
for the second half, which is where the real value of this film lies.  The
second part concerns the students' efforts to prepare for and take the Advanced
Placement calculus exam, which no student had previously tried in the history
of Garfield High.  The Educational Testing Service (ETS), which administers the
tests, discovers that a number of the students made the same mistake on the
test and therefore opened an investigation into possible cheating.  Realizing
that their scores will be voided is the biggest setback the kids suffer since
they came under Escalante's spell, and in addition to upsetting the high school
seniors' plans to attend college, the accusations thoroughly demoralize
Escalante and his students.
     At this point, the film finally begins to examine some of the deeper
issues that so badly need to be brought to light.  In one tremendously
evocative scene, Escalante confronts the ETS investigators (Andy Garcia and Rif
Hutton) who have been trying to convince the kids to "confess" how they
cheated.  Working himself up, Escalante points out that the kids made the same
mistake because they all had the same teacher, and he angrily adds that the
kids' scores would never have been questioned had the school been located in an
upper-class suburb and had the kids' names been non-Hispanic.  In another scene
later on, Escalante finds himself re-examining the wisdom of his decisions to
push the students to learn calculus as hard as he did.  These are the types of
scenes that display the soul-searching and human weaknesses that firmly ground
the film's story in reality and carry the students' eventual triumph to truly
inspiring heights.
     Throughout the film, the camerawork does little to distinguish itself from
the style of made-for-television films, but the final shot of the film is
well-composed and deserves some mention.  Just prior to the shot, Escalante is
in the office of the Principal Molina (Carmen Argenziano) discussing whether
the kids really cheated, when a phone call brings news of the kids' excellent
scores on the re-test.  As the dumbfounded principal reads out the grades in a
voice over, Escalante exits the office and walks down the hallway.  The camera
shows the length of the hallway from the office to the doorway at the far end.
As Escalante nears the doorway, he silently permits himself a hand-raised
cheer.  Then, silhouetted by the light from the doorway and his back still
turned to the audience, he keeps on walking down the hallway and out the door,
which shuts behind him.  After a few more shots, the credits begin to roll.
    The reason the shot works so well is the stoic way in which Olmos conveys
Escalante's acceptance of the final payoff of all his efforts.  Instead of
patting himself on the back, Olmos lets the audience cheer for Escalante.
Olmos also recognizes that the film's ending is the beginning of Escalante's
efforts, and Olmos plays the scene accordingly.  The way Olmos walks down the
hall through the doorway, one feels that Escalante is going back to his
classroom to teach some more students.  The camerawork also does not overly
hype the triumph.  The filmmakers could easily have shifted the point of view
to a front view of Olmos and then ended the film on a freeze-frame of Olmos'
upraised hand.  They wisely chose not to do so.  The result of how they did
compose the shot is that the ending is easily the best moment in the film.
     One of Escalante's innovations was to display posters of Einstein and
Galileo in his classroom next to popular sports figures like Kareem
Abdul-Jabbar.  Escalante knew that if he could get his students to respect the
great thinkers as much as they admired rock stars and movie actors, his battle
was half won.  The filmmakers show the posters only in the background, but they
too know that the real importance of Escalante's story lies in changing
viewers' attitudes enough to cheer for a schoolteacher who cares and beats the
odds.  The filmmakers manage to bring the story to the screen -- although
clumsily -- and that in of itself is remarkable and refreshing in the final
analysis.
The filmmakers of STAND AND DELIVER are mainly recent graduates from film
schools making their feature film debut.  Director Ramon Menendez emigrated to
the United States from Cuba in the early 1960s when he was still a child.  He
enrolled in the UCLA film school in 1976, where he met Tom Musca (producer and
co-writer) and Tom Richmond (cinematographer).  Editor Nancy Richardson also
attended the UCLA film school.

Title
Review for Someone to Love (1987)
Cast: Orson Welles, Henry Jaglom, Andrea Marcovicci, Michael Emil,
Sally Kellerman, Oja Kodar, Stephen Bishop, Dave Frishberg, Geraldine Baron,
Ronee Blakely, Barbara Flood, Pamela Goldblum, Robert Hallak, Kathryn Harrold,
Monte Hellman, Jeremy Kagan, Michael Kaye, Miles Kreuger, Amnon Meskin,
Sunny Meyer, Peter Rafelson, Ora Rubens, Katherine Wallach.
Credits: Written and Directed by Henry Jaglom.  Produced by M. H. Simonsons.
Associate Producer: Judith Wolinksky.  Director of Photography: Hanania Baer.
Sound: Sunny Meyer.  Assistant Editor: Ruth Wald.  Songs by Diane Bulgarelli,
Stephen Bishop, Dave Frishberg, and Jerome Kern & Ira Gershwin.
     Henry Jaglom has remained outside the Hollywood mainstream for more than a
decade and a half, and he's quite proud of his role as a maverick.  A close
friend of Orson Welles, Jaglom has written and directed seven films since 1970,
each costing less than $1 million.  He has insisted on total artistic control
over them all, looking inward for the source material of his films.  For
example, his 1985 film ALWAYS examined his divorce from actress Patrice
Townsend and was shot entirely in the house they had shared.  Whenever a
filmmaker (and artists in general) focus on themselves in this manner, they
typically find themselves accused of wallowing in self-indulgence.  This sort
of criticism doesn't faze Jaglom.  "To get something of universal value,"
Jaglom said in a telephone conversation, "you have to focus on one specific
issue" rather than appealing to the lowest common denominator.  Of course, the
issue Jaglom is most familiar with is himself.
     He has creatively used his independence once again in SOMEONE TO LOVE.  In
it, he raises the question of why people are lonely, especially on that most
romantic of holidays, Valentine's Day.  Of course, Jaglom is a filmmaker and
not a sociologist or philosopher, and so he doesn't have any real answers to
this profoundly human question.  Given that reality, Jaglom said that he knew
from the start that "I would paint myself into a corner."  Therefore, Jaglom
asked Orson Welles to put things in "historical perspective" and to impart his
considerable wisdom and experience not only in filmic matters but in the tricky
ground of love and interpersonal relationships.
     The film begins, appropriately enough, with a few choice words from
Welles.  Then it quickly shifts to Danny (Jaglom) and Helen (Andrea Marcovicci,
with whom Jaglom has spent most of the past five years with in real life)
getting ready to go to sleep.  Helen, who has just gotten used to sleeping
alone after the painful breakup of her previous relationship, tells Danny that
she won't be able to go to sleep if he remains inside her house.  This arouses
Danny's curiosity, and he sends out telegrams to his show business friends to
gather on Valentine's Day at a beautiful theater in Santa Monica (the Mayfair
Theater) that is about to be replaced by a shopping mall.  Danny, a filmmaker,
figures that he might get some interesting footage, and at the very least he
will be able to introduce his brother Mickey (Michael Emil, Jaglom's brother in
real life) to some romantic companions.
     When Valentine's Day arrives, Danny's friends arrive expecting a party but
find themselves talking about themselves and their loneliness into the handheld
Arriflex cameras run by the film crew Danny has brought along.  One soon
realizes that all the actors in Danny's film are in fact thinly disguised
versions of the actors in Jaglom's film.  And Danny the filmmaker is really
Jaglom the filmmaker, while Welles (listed as "Danny's Friend" in the credits)
is, of course, himself.  These dichotomies becomes more and more unified as the
film goes on, until it is nearly impossible to distinguish between actor and
character.
     This sort of "interview" filmmaking can be traced to the Brechtian and
Godardian technique of having actors interrupt the narrative flow to comment on
their perceptions of what their character is doing and why.  And indeed, Jaglom
cites as his primary influences the great filmmakers of the 1960s -- Bergman,
Fellini, Godard, Truffaut.  Although the film has a somewhat documentary feel
to it, Jaglom says he has not been influenced by the cinema verite movement, as
epitomized by Frederick Wiseman.  Instead, he likes the label that some critics
have given his works, "emotional verite."
     Given the close relationship between Danny's film and Jaglom's film, one
can't help but wonder how SOMEONE TO LOVE was constructed.  Did Jaglom notify
his actors about his plans?  Or did he pull a trick similar to the one Danny
pulls for his film?  In reply, Jaglom simply says that SOMEONE TO LOVE reflects
his general filmmaking technique.  He mentions that he scripts thorough
guidelines for his actors but lets the actors fill in the actual phrasing of
dialogue.  Jaglom says that he likes to "go with the emotion that's going on"
during the shoot.  When shooting is complete, Jaglom retreats to the editing
room for several months where he "reinvents" the film, melding the disparate
elements into an evolving whole.
     The result of this process doesn't always seem to work, and indeed,
SOMEONE TO LOVE is more interesting for Jaglom's (and Welles') ideas on
filmmaking than as illumination on romance.  Jaglom's favorite quotation is one
from Orson Welles: "The enemy of art is the absence of limitations."  In
principle, this is entirely accurate; the great film artists are the ones who
have transcended barriers -- both human and technical -- to arrive at new forms
of expression of their ideas.  Many of these great filmmakers, especially those
hampered by official condemnation or censorship, have had to struggle mightily
for the opportunity to create their art.  In Jaglom's case, however, the
barriers he overcomes are not intrinsic ones to the medium of film.  By
definition, film is a technological art form, and Jaglom will be the first to
admit he has done nothing to advance the technical state of filmic art.  Asked
why he then employs the medium of film instead of, say, books or stage plays,
Jaglom replies that he prefers the basic tools of the cinema because they give
him access to closeups, sound manipulations, and editing.  Jaglom says he
decided not to use television or video, which offer similar advantages, because
cinema has a "different feel," at least for now.  He stresses that for him (as
opposed to Spielberg or Lucas), technology must always be used to stimulate
minds about humans and humanity.
     Even on the human side, though, it's not that easy to identify or relate
to Danny, who seems to have swallowed completely the veneer of dazzling romance
put forth by countless Hollywood movies.  (When Helen reminds Danny that "Not
everyone wants a picket fence, you know," Danny replies "Well, everyone
should," without bothering to give a reason why everyone should feel that way.)
Given that most real life relationships don't even come close to enjoying the
grandeur on display in most movie romances, it's no wonder that Danny feels
something is wrong.  Danny, though, doesn't seem able to trace his problem back
to his premise, and he just sticks microphones in people's faces and continues
asking questions, looking more and more foolish as he goes along.
     But this usual sort of criticism is misplaced here because Jaglom is quite
consciously portraying Danny as a lovable buffoon.  It has almost become a
Jaglom trademark for his character to simultaneously be a protagonist and an
anti-egotist.  As mentioned above, Jaglom knew from the beginning that his
project would not work without Welles.  It takes Danny a bit longer to come to
the same conclusion while shooting his film.  Finally, around the end of the
fourth reel, Danny throws his hands up in the air and mutters, "It's not going
to work.  It doesn't work."  And that's when Danny/Jaglom bring Welles in again
to offer his wisdom.  Viewers may condemn Jaglom for self-indulgence, but no
one can possibly accuse him of being arrogant or self-serving.
     By playing a filmmaker making a film which is essentially the same film
that viewers are seeing, Jaglom succeeds on two fronts.  First, he manages to
raise some basic questions about people as simple, living, human, beings.
Second, he then steps back and encourages the characters in the film, as well
as the members of the audience itself, to ponder and think for themselves what
appropriate responses there may be to Jaglom's questions.  Because there is no
bearded saint dispensing wisdom from a mountaintop in this film -- Welles
doesn't, count, despite the fact that he is indeed bearded and wearing a long
flowing wine-colored robe; he can only gently guide viewers with his advice,
because he too doesn't have any magic answers -- there is no hope of being
spoon-fed with ready made solutions.  The actors and actresses in Danny's film
rise to the challenge: they think *for themselves* about loneliness and pour
forth a rush of diverse answers, as diverse as the actors themselves.  What
emerges of value is not only the specific answers; in addition, it is the
emotional and intellectual processes by which Danny's friends derive their
answers that is also important.  Danny/Jaglom has recognized, perhaps
subconsciously, that methods often get lost in the perpetual craving for
predigested results, and it is exactly that realization which SOMEONE TO LOVE
is trying to convey to its viewers, at least to the viewers who remain until
the end.
     This sort of reflexive filmmaking is rare, of course, and it certainly is
removed from the common assumptions of conventional cinema.  (Only two films in
recent memory have similarly linked filmmakers, actors, and viewers together,
one being GIRLTALK and the other a 14-1/2 hour marathon on nuclear war called
THE JOURNEY.)  This separation from the mainstream is hardly a weakness.
Rather, it emphasizes and affirms that Jaglom is one of the endangered species
of American cinema.  He is a serious and dedicated film artist who refuses to
pander to the box office, and he has consistently declined offers to direct big
budget films in order to persevere and preserve his integrity.  His themes are
by no means revolutionary, and his simple cinematic style couldn't be more
different from the highly technical art of Orson Welles or Stanley Kubrick's
2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY (1968).  But Jaglom has adopted these and other
filmmakers' visionary outlook on the potentials of filmic art and turned it
inward to make highly personal and intimately human films.  Like the actors and
actresses in Danny's film, viewers and up-and-coming filmmakers would do well
to experience the subtle methodology underlying and enriching Jaglom's SOMEONE
TO LOVE.
Directorial filmography of Henry Jaglom:
Orson Welles once said that Henry Jaglom's films have "no cute little space
creatures, no chases, no rapes, no murders."  And it's true.  His latest film,
NEW YEAR'S DAY, will be released this coming winter.  Currently he is shooting
a film in Los Angeles called EATING, which will focus on "women and their
obsessions with food."  He has also recently established the Women's Film
Company as a subsidiary of his International Rainbow Pictures to produce
"low-budget, hopefully high-quality, human stories" by women directors.

Title
Review for Night in the Life of Jimmy Reardon, A (1988)
Cast: River Phoenix, Ann Magnuson, Meredith Salenger, Ione Skye, Louanne,
Matthew L. Perry, Paul Koslo, Jane Hallaren, Jason Court, James Deuter,
Marji Banks, Margaret Moore, Anastasia Fielding, Kamie Harper, Johnny Galecki.
Credits: Written and Directed by William Richert.  Based on the novel AREN'T YOU
EVEN GOING TO KISS ME GOODBYE by William Richert.  Produced by Russel Schwartz.
Director of Photography: John J. Connor.  Production Designer: Norman Newberry.
Editor: Suzanne Fenn.  Costume Designer: Bob De Mora.  Music by Bill Conti.
Art Director: John R. Jensen.
     River Phoenix gained a following based on his performances in STAND BY ME
and THE MOSQUITO COAST.  This film will do nothing to enhance his reputation.
     He plays a recent high school graduate in an upwardly-mobile family that
has just settled into a ritzy suburb of Chicago.  While all his friends go off
to Ivy League schools, Jimmy's overbearing dad wants Jimmy to attend his alma
mater, a dreary business school.  The film is ostensibly about how Jimmy comes
to terms with his parents while coming of age.
     But the whole film is a mess, from beginning to end.  Jimmy is never a
sympathetic character, even when he gets beat up by the poet boyfriend of his
ex-girlfriend.  The only feeling one is left with is that this skinny little
weasel deserves it.
     His fooling around with girls leads him to bed Joyce (Ann Magnuson) -- who
is a friend of his mother and seems to be running for the most unlikely Mrs.
Robinson award.  What's more, Jimmy's date has to wait for him to take her to a
school dance while he's getting his jollies with Joyce.  If that weren't sleazy
enough, Jimmy spends the rest of the film trying to get in the pants of
virtually every girl he sees.  And he sees more of his buddy's girlfriend than
his buddy ever does.
     The sexual stereotyping in this film could be dismissed as a historical
anachronism since the film is set in 1962.  But because the setting is
virtually irrelevant to the story, younger viewers could translate the film's
misogyny to the present.  The teenyboppers in the row behind me did just that:
every time a girl submitted to Jimmy's advances, they would mutter "She's a
slut," never realizing that *he* is the one hopping from bed to bed.
     Even worse, this cheap ripoff of THE GRADUATE comes with a sick twist:
Jimmy's dad is also sleeping with Joyce.  Jimmy finds out and blackmails his
dad into forgetting about Jimmy's wrecking the family car.  This somehow is
supposed to lead to reconciliation and understanding between father and son.
It's difficult to believe that a filmmaker would have the gall to assert that a
meaningful relationship could be based on such deception.
     In one scene, Jimmy meets his buddy's girlfriend in her bedroom while THE
ADVENTURES OF ROBIN HOOD (1938) plays on the television.  It's telling that
hearing a few seconds of Erich Wolfgang Korngold's magnificent score for Errol
Flynn's swashbuckler was the most invigorating moment in this film.
     A NIGHT IN THE LIFE OF JIMMY REARDON will not be of the slightest interest
to those past puberty.  If it must be involved in your weekend plans, use it as
a 93-minute babysitter for a kid sister or brother.  After all, they're
perfectly suited to the mentality of this afterschool television special
masquerading as a film.
(But make sure they understand why Jimmy Reardon is such a repulsive little
monster afterwards.)
William Richert's previous film, WINTER KILLS, has apparently garnered some
critical praise.  It's difficult to understand what happened to William Richert
in the intervening eight years between that film and this fiasco.

Title
Review for Cry Freedom (1987)
Cast: Denzel Washington, Kevin Kline, Penelope Wilton, John Hargreaves,
      Alex McCowen, Kevin McNally, Zakes Mokae, Ian Richardson, Josette Simon,
      John Thaw, Timothy West, Miles Anderson, Tommy Buson, Jim Findlay,
      Julian Glover, Kate Hardie, Alton Kumalo, Louis Mahoney, Mawa Makondo,
      Joseph Marcel, John Matshikiza, Sophie Mgcina, Wabei Siyolwe,
      Gwen Watford, Juanita Waterman.
     Recently, a reviewer for THE BOSTON PHOENIX (a local arts and news weekly)
called the film MATEWAN an example of "liberal Pavlovian movie making."  This
is a far more apt label for CRY FREEDOM, Sir Richard Attenborough's new film
about Stephen Biko (played by Denzel Washington), the black South African
student activist leader, and his friendship with Donald Woods (played by Kevin
Kline), a white South African newspaper editor who considered his own liberal
views as his contribution to the reform of Apartheid.
     CRY FREEDOM begins by showing Woods' initial contact with Biko in 1975 and
ends with the Woods' family's escape from South Africa after Biko's death under
mysterious circumstances while in police custody in 1977.
     Technically, the film is thoroughly conventional.  Sir Richard himself has
said that this was the easiest of his films to make.  There are inspired
moments, however.  The sound montage that accompanies a series of freeze-frame
images of a pre-dawn police raid on a shantytown is quite effective as part of
the film's opening sequence.  Flashbacks are sparingly used, and the film is
blessed with good performances from the major leads as well as the large number
of supporting characters.  The widescreen composition and stereo sound are
serviceable, but they break no new ground.  George Fenton's and Jonas Gwanga's
music is notable, as is Sir Richard's expertise at directing large crowd scenes
with as many as 15,000 extras.
     The film's major flaw stems not from its production qualities, but from
the sacrifices under which Sir Richard made this film.  These sacrifices become
especially apparent as the film progresses from its first half to its second.
Within its limitations as a major Hollywood film, CRY FREEDOM works quite well,
but the very existence of its compromises prevents the film from completely
fulfilling is avowed educational purpose.
     The first half of the 155-minute-long film focuses on the power of Biko's
charismatic personality as Biko leads Woods to understand for the first time
the harsh realities blacks face both as third class citizens and as "banned"
persons.  The depth of Biko's confidence in the humanity of himself and his
fellow blacks is demonstrated time and again as Biko refuses to succumb to the
authorities' provocations.  The genius of Stephen Biko is that even as he urges
Woods and others to "Drink up!"  while relaxing in a bar in a black township,
he is able to point out the stark contrast between Woods' opulent lifestyle and
the poverty of of black shantytowns.  It is in eloquent scenes such as these
where individuals and events in South Africa are allowed to speak for
themselves that the film is at its greatest.
     Unfortunately, Biko's death comes almost exactly halfway through the film.
In order to make the film palatable to Westerners--which is to say white
audiences--the second half of the film concentrates on the Woods family as they
flee South Africa and the personal turmoil Biko's death has created for them.
The family eventually settled in England, where Donald Woods published his two
books BIKO and ASKING FOR TROUBLE on which the film is based.
     There is no denying that Mr. Woods and his family suffered greatly during
their ordeal, and their story deserves to be told as well.  The film, however,
trivializes and cheapens their escape from South Africa by degenerating into an
inane melodrama worthy of a made-for-TV movie.  The film goes so out of its way
to help audiences identify with the Woods family that it becomes self-apparent
and almost begins to wallow in cheap sentimentality.
     The film's most inexcusable moment comes when Mrs. Woods and her five
children pause during their flight to freedom at the white line on the bridge
between South Africa and Lesotho.  Instead of hurrying over the bridge to
safety, they take one slow step over the line under a torrential downpour while
Donald Woods waits for them at the Lesotho end of the bridge.  Efforts like
this one to heighten suspense and drama fall flat because the Woods family did
make it out and Donald Woods did write his books.  When the end result is
known, viewers can relax because they know subconsciously that the Woods'
family's current predicament will be resolved in their favor.
     Furthermore, the film is factually mistaken at a point where it most needs
to be accurate.  The finale of the film--quite stirring and moving in its own
right--wrenches the audience back to the horrors the Woods family escaped from
by recreating the 1976 massacre of several hundred black students in Soweto who
were protesting mandatory teaching of the Afrikaans language in schools.  This
incident touched off rioting and protests and is an important part of the
history of black struggle in South Africa.
     The film shows the attacking policemen to be all white, whereas in
actuality, many of them were black.  Sir Richard told The New York Times that
he took cinematic license here so as not to confuse Western audiences away from
the film's central reminder that Apartheid is "an obscenity."  This
simplification of complex political realities demonstrates the sort of
compromises Sir Richard made in order to assure box-office success.  It is
exceedingly unfortunate that Sir Richard feels he must disguise his
intelligence and sensitivity in order to bring his message to American
audiences.
     When Biko first meets Woods, he makes a comment that he is about to begin
"the education of a white liberal."  These words describe the film exactly.
Conservatives like Jesse Helms and Jerry Falwell will deride the film and
attempt to discredit it by calling attention to its few but significant
deviations from journalistic accuracy.  Those who are already sympathetic to
the issue of racism yet know little or nothing about the details of South
Africa pass laws and other restrictions will find this a moving and distressing
film.  This film will challenge them to seek ways to help dismantle Apartheid
in whatever small way they can.  Those who have kept up with current events and
know more about South Africa will find little new in the film.  Indeed, some
may even consider the "liberal Pavlovian" second half demeaning and insulting
because of its typical Hollywood oversimplifications.
     In spite of all this, Sir Richard must be commended for creating the film
in the first place.  His commitment against Apartheid was made clear when he
refused to attend South African premieres of his previous film GANDHI in 1982,
and his meetings with Winnie Mandela and other black leaders in 1984 gave him
the background necessary to make a film such as CRY FREEDOM.  It is no
exaggeration to say that Sir Richard is more qualified than any other director
to make this film.  Sir Richard's humanity and conviction is unassailable.
     Nevertheless, given his stature and his avowed purpose to help educate
people about Apartheid, it is somewhat frustrating that his film has not
carried the debate past its state last fall when both houses of Congress voted
to override President Reagan's veto of a limited economic sanctions bill
against South Africa.
     The most notable accomplishment of CRY FREEDOM is its stirring portrayal
of Stephen Biko and its effort to keep the issue of South Africa's racist
policies alive in the news in Western countries.  For now, that will have to be
enough.
Directorial Filmography of Sir Richard Attenborough:
Sir Richard Attenborough is an actor-producer-director who has been involved
with film since an early age.  He has acted in films such as THE GREAT ESCAPE
(1963), DOCTOR DOOLITTLE (1967), DAVID COPPERFIELD (1969), and LOOT (1971).
His films have been critically acclaimed, especially A BRIDGE TOO FAR and
GANDHI.  He won an Oscar for Best Director in 1982 for GANDHI.  He was knighted
in 1976, and he won India's Padma Bhushan award and the Martin Luther King
Peace Prize in 1983.

Title
Review for Girltalk (1987)
Credits: Directed and Produced by Kate Davis.  Cinematography and Associate
Directed by Alyson Denny.  Additional Photography by Richard Leacock.  Edited
by Kate Davis and Alyson Denny.  Associate Producer: Pat Gross.
     Women's issues are, paradoxically, often defined by men, and
male-dominated film industries offer few exceptions to this rule.  GIRLTALK is
a refreshing change, in that it is one of the few films about women's issues
made by women.  By documenting the lives of three teenage runaway girls from
Boston in an unflinching, intuitive style without slick television-style
commentary, the film ends up relying on the audience to decide which issues are
and are not important.
     Director/producer/editor Kate Davis and cinematographer/editor Alyson
Denny enlisted the help of youth service agencies, runaway shelters, and the
police while searching for suitable subjects for the documentary.  After
extensively combing the streets of Boston, they ultimately found Pinky, Mars,
and Martha.
     What links the three girls together is their common history of abuse and
neglect.  Pinky's father left home when she was small, and her mother was
judged to be "a neglectful parent."  This 14-year-old now refuses to go to
school and is fascinated by pop music and anything pink.  She even wears pink
Reeboks.
     Martha was sexually abused by her foster father for six years.  Her mother
was diagnosed as a paranoid schizophrenic.  Now alone and pregnant at 18, she
ended up living in over twenty foster homes and institutions after her father
was sent to jail.
     Mars' father once threatened to take her to "a motel room and break her in
right."  Mars has been on the street since age 13, and she was once gang-raped
until she lost consciousness.  She now works as a stripper in the Combat Zone
(Boston's red-light district), where her specialty is to flip cartwheels, lick
lollipops, and ride a tricycle in a disturbingly schoolgirlish fashion.
     These harsh realities are presented, however, quite matter-of-factly
through an unusual symbiosis between filmmaker and subject that hasn't been
seen much since Jean Rouch's CHRONICLE OF A SUMMER (1961).  Most cinema verite
filmmakers these days endeavor to disguise or limit the camera's "presence" and
influence on the unfolding events.  In this film, however, Davis and Denny seem
more interested in transforming the filmmaking process into a healing mechanism
to make a positive difference in the life of the girls.
     For example, Davis and Denny had the girls deliberately address the
camera.  According to an article in the Windy City Times, Davis told the girl
that she "would take care [of them] before and after filming -- that I wouldn't
just run away to get it sold."  She even let the girls help edit the final cut
of the film.  While this close link between filmmaker and subject removes any
claim to journalistic objectivity, it allows Davis and Denny to apply their
integrity as filmmakers and human beings in directions quite different from the
typical documentary.  The result is both candid and often painful.
     Pinky seems the most uncomfortable with the film project because she
remains the most enigmatic of the three.  Apart from introducing the viewer to
childhood problems typical to many troubled teenagers and setting the tone for
the rest of the film, her presence in the film has little to reveal.  Asked why
she "likes being a girl," she responds that "Girls get more respect.  That's
what I think."
     The film is more effective in depicting the complexities of why Mars
continues to work as a stripper.  It would be quite easy to blame her because
it is apparent that she is not a drug addict or physically restrained to the
bar she works in.  But the film goes on to reveal a hidden emotional tie to her
work: Mars claims that her schoolgirl routine is her way of becoming a child
for the first time in her life.  When she calls the bartender "Daddy," or puts
a little sign on her tricycle's handbasket reading `" Refuse To Grow Up," it
seems clear that she is trying to regain her lost childhood.
     It would be patronizing to conclude that Mars is a total victim of her
past and that she can do nothing now to assuage her problems.  Nevertheless,
the issue of why she remains a stripper is far more complex than many would
care to admit.  The film's presentation of Mars' childhood and her current
position force a reexamination of the issue and caution against a casual
dismissal of Mars as a willing victim.  And by doing so, it carries the debate
one step further.
     The film is at its best, however, as it follows Martha from late pregnancy
to the birth of her child.  The child's father is nowhere in sight, and it is
apparent that Martha will succeed or fail on the basis of her own efforts.
Martha is quite aware that patterns of abuse tend to repeat themselves, and she
worries about being a good mother.  One can only lament the early loss of
childhood's innocence that leads Martha to say "I feel a lot older than 19."
But it is also quite touching and inspiring to see her rising above her dismal
childhood to take charge of her own life.
     GIRLTALK is not a well-reasoned and provocative argument piece like the
feminist documentaries RATE IT X and STILL KILLING US SOFTLY.  Rather than
trying to dazzle the viewer with brilliant scholarship or rhetoric, this film
is more an introspective examination of the filmmakers' efforts to work with
the three girls.  The lessons to be learned stem from an evolving and intuitive
experience rather than from critical or substantive analysis.  GIRLTALK manages
to explore areas that have been given little attention in a manner that is not
always successful but still effective in its own way.
     Kate Davis was producer and editor of VACANT LOT, "a dramatic film about
three Boston teenage boys."  Other films she has worked on include PARIS IS
BURNING, LOVE STORIES, KATE, and WACKO.
     Alyson Denny wrote and directed SATURDAY AFTERNOON and BREAKFAST AT
EIGHT.  She was also editor and animator for Ross McElwee's SHERMAN'S MARCH.
Both Davis and Denny have taught filmmaking at Harvard University.
     Richard Leacock founded the film department at MIT, and he was a pioneer
in the development of cinema verite during the 1960s.  His films include
GALAPAGOS ISLANDS (1938), PRIMARY (1960), HAPPY MOTHER'S DAY (1963), and DON'T
LOOK BACK (1967).

Title
Review for Anna (1987)
Cast: Sally Kirkland, Robert Fields, Paulina Porizkova, Gibby Brand, John Robert
Tillotson, Julianne Gilliam, Joe Aufiery, Lance Davis, Deirdre O'Connell, Ruth
Maleczech, Holly Villaire, Shirl Bernheim, Rene Coleman, Gabriella Farrar,
Jordana Levine, Rosalia Traina, Maggie Wagner, Charles Randall, Mimi Wedell,
Larry Pine, Lola Pashalinkski, Stefan Schnabel, Steven Gilborn, Rand Stone,
Geena Goodwin, David Ellis, Brian Kohn, Caroline Aaron, Vasek Simek, Paul Leski,
Larry Attile, and Sofia Coppola.
Credits: Director: Yurek Bogayevicz.  Producers: Zanne Devine and Yurek
Bogayevicz.  Executive Producers: Julianne Gilliam and Deirdre Gainor.
Screenplay by Agnieszka Holland.  Story by Yurek Bogayevicz and Agnieszka
Holland.  Original score composed and performed by Greg Hawkes.  Production
Manager/Associate Producer: Brenda Goodman.  Costume Designer: Hali Breindel.
Production Designer: Lester Cohen.  Editor: Julie Sloane.  Director of
Photography: Bobby Bukowski.  Art Director: Daniel Talpers.  Sound: William
Sarokin.
     From Polish director Yurek Bogayevicz and writer Agnieszka Holland comes
this film featuring a powerhouse performance by actress Sally Kirkland in
several scenes of deep psychological intensity.  Although the plot, which
resembles the story of Joseph L. Mankiewicz's 1950 classic ALL ABOUT EVE,
leaves much to be desired, Sally Kirkland certainly deserves recognition for
her superb acting in what is perhaps the best female lead role so far this
year.
     Anna (played by Sally Kirkland) used to be a well-known and successful
actress in her native Czechoslovakia before she was permanently exiled for her
outspokenness against the 1968 Soviet invasion.  The loss of her family,
homeland, youthful beauty, and career in rapid succession took its emotional
toll, leaving Anna ill-prepared to cope with her fall from great stardom to
relative obscurity as another unknown hopeful actress in New York.
     The only bright spot in her life comes from the persona of Krystyna
(played by the beautiful fashion model Paulina Porizkova), a young
Czechoslovakian woman who immigrates to the US to meet Anna, her star and idol.
Touched by Krystyna's innocence and naivete, Anna takes Krystyna under her wing
and helps Krystyna adjust to life in America, both as a foreigner and
struggling actress.
     It is when the film concentrates on Anna and Krystyna that it is at its
best.  One scene in particular, where Anna movingly recounts the loss of her
baby due to harsh prison conditions in Czechoslovakia, stands out as being
extremely effective.  As Anna and Krystyna lie on their bed late at night, the
camera slowly pans in one smooth movement from the bedroom door to focus on
their faces.  No sound except Anna's emotion-laden whisper is heard as she
relates her life story.  The lighting is unobtrusively low-key.  Anna and
Krystyna lie almost motionless throughout the scene, with the reverie finally
being broken as Krystyna stirs.  This scene integrates the power of the spoken
word with the language of cinema so well that it achieves an Ingmar
Bergmanesque quality rarely seen in recent films.  The initial relationship
between Anna and Krystyna is the highlight of the film.
     That period of deep friendship lasts until Krystyna borrows her most
intimate sorrows during a talk show interview.  Anna, feeling betrayed and
outraged, throws out Krystyna and her belongings from her apartment.  Krystyna
continues to advance in her acting career while Anna falls deeper into a mental
morass, losing her job (as an understudy for an Off-Off-Broadway production) as
well as her occasional lover Daniel (played by Robert Fields), who leaves her
for Krystyna's glamorous beauty.  Anna's mind snaps under the strain, leading
to the climax of the film.
     The full potential of the narrative premise outlined above is undermined,
however, by heavy-handed efforts to explain Anna's mental collapse.  In the
course of 100 minutes, the film encompasses issues of divorce, betrayal,
attempted murder, a stillborn birth, cutoff from childhood roots, failure in
one's lifetime dreams and aspirations, and a few others thrown in for good
measure.  Each one is individually believable and treated well, but as each one
is introduced the narrative increasingly resembles the histrionic plotline
common to soap operas.  Every single character in this film is so laden with
problems that initial sympathy for them simply withers away as the film
progresses, despite the autobiographical elements of Holland's script (see
below).  The best that can be said for the ending is that at least it avoids an
easy or "happy" resolution, which would have made the film downright ludicrous.
     To make matters worse, director Bogayevicz employs well-worn cliches, such
as sudden rainfalls and the melt-down of film celluloid (with Anna's picture
being burned, no less), as well as visual punctuation to drive home Anna's
psychological despair.  At one point, even an elevator Anna is using is shown
from above as it descends into the darkness far below.  The striking intensity
of the film's opening moments dissipates as the film progresses, leaving a
feeling of squandered opportunity.  Bogayevicz's prior experience with theater
shows through, but it is mostly out of place in this film.  The scenes that
take place on a theater stage are directed well, but Bogayevicz's overall
visual style exacerbates an already overbearing script, rather than smoothing
over the film's rougher moments.
     And Paulina Porizkova is disappointing as well.  Her role itself basically
is one of standing prettily while the camera focuses on her, much like her
previous job as fashion model.  Even the film she is shown making as Krystyna
near the end of ANNA is one where she walks around on a beach in a bikini.
Instead of solidly presenting her acting talents, her film debut prevents
judgement either way as to whether or not she will fail as an actress like so
many fashion models before her.  Better roles than this one must come in order
to demonstrate whatever abilities she may possess.
     ANNA is the first film by Bogayevicz and Holland together, and it shows
promise for their efforts in the future, as the film does have occasional
moments of vision that shine through.  For now, Sally Kirkland's performance is
the most notable attraction in this film, especially in a scene near the
beginning when the anguish in her face at having to prove herself yet once
again to another casting director's assistant is palpable and unmistakable.
The strength of Sally Kirkland's performance apparent in this and many other
scenes never falters throughout the course of the film.  Her work over the past
25 years has failed to gain public recognition, despite roles opposite Robert
Redford in THE STING, Gene Hackman in BITE THE BULLET, and Barbra Streisand in
THE WAY WE WERE and A STAR IS BORN, as well as theater work with Andy Warhol,
Tom O'Horgan, and Robert DeNiro.  Her lead performance in ANNA would be one of
the few truly-deserved Best Actress nominations in recent years.
Previous work of Yurek Bogayevicz and Agnieszka Holland:
     As noted above, this is Bogayevicz's debut as film director.  Having
enrolled at the acclaimed Academy of Theatre Arts in Warsaw, he worked in
Polish theater for many years.  Upon moving to the United States and eventually
settling in Los Angeles, his work as producer and director of Bertold Brecht's
"The Resistable Rise of Arturo Ui" won many major Los Angeles theater critics
awards, including being named Director of the Year by The Los Angeles Times and
Dramalogue.
     Agnieszka Holland was also born in Poland.  She studied film in Prague
with Milos Forman and Ivan Passer.  Returning to Poland in 1972 after being
imprisoned by Czech authorities in 1970 during the aftermath of the Soviet
invasion, she directed many films including STORY OF A BOMB (winner of the 1981
Gdansk Film Festival), A LONLEY WOMAN, and ANGRY HARVEST, which was nominated
for the Best Foreign Film Oscar in 1985.  She has also collaborated with noted
director Andrzej Wadja on numerous screenplays.  She is currently directing TO
KILL A PRIEST starring Ed Harris as the Reverend Jerzy Popieluszko, a popular
pro-Solidarity priest who was murdered in Poland in 1984.  It will be released
by Columbia Pictures next year.

Title
Review for Lighthorsemen, The (1987)
Cast: Peter Phelps, Anthony Andrews, Sigrid Thornton, John Walton,
Tim McKenzie, Jon Blake, Bill Kerr, Tony Bonner, Shane Briant, Ralph Cotterill,
Grant Piro, Tony Bonner, Patrick Frost, Adrian Wright, Anthony Hawkins,
Gerard Kennedy, Graham Dow, James Wright, Scott Bradley.
Credits: Directed by Simon Wincer.  Produced by Ian Jones and Simon Wincer.
Executive Producer: Tony Ginnane.  Screenplay: Ian Jones.  Music Composed and
Arranged by Mario Millo.  Editor: Adrian Carr.  Production Designer: Bernard
Hides.  Director of Photography: Dean Semler, A.C.S.  Sound Editors: Peter
Burgess, Craig Carter, and Livia Ruzic.  Stunt Coordinator: Grant Page.
Masters of Horse: Gerald Egan, Bill Willoughby, Jim Willoughby, and
Peter D. Smith.
     The Australian film renaissance began about a decade and half ago as
directors like Peter Weir, Gillian Armstrong, George Miller, Bruce Beresford,
and others began to create outstanding and innovative films.  Their creative
vitality not only opened doors for newer filmmakers but assured significant
worldwide distribution of a distinctly Australian cinema.  But it is
increasingly becoming apparent that not only are the good films crossing the
Pacific but the drek as well.  THE LIGHTHORSEMEN belongs squarely in the latter
category.  It practically deifies an Australian military victory in World War I
and throws in a ludicrously sappy romance for good measure.  Worse yet, it
tries to be all things to different people by including a subplot about a young
soldier who finds it difficult to shoot a fellow human being.
     The Australian Lighthorsemen were a group of mounted soldiers who would
ride their horses near their target, dismount, and proceed to attack on foot
like infantrymen.  In 1917, they won a crucial battle that broke the stalemate
in the British campaign in Palestine.  800 Lighthorsemen trekked through the
desert and overcame a force of 4000 defenders to overtake the Turkish-German
stronghold of Beersheeba.  By capturing this strategically vital and water-rich
town, the Lighthorsemen succeeded where the British had failed.
     It is within this historical context that the film's events unfold.  The
film focuses on four Lighthorsemen who take part in the attack, Frank (Gary
Sweet), Tas (John Walton), Scotty (Jon Blake), and Chiller (Tim McKenzie).
They have been together since the battle of Gallipoli, but their camaraderie is
shaken early in the film when the wounded Frank is replaced by a young recruit
from Melbourne named Dave (Peter Phelps).  [See accompanying article for an
interview with Peter Phelps.]  The three men initially resent Dave's attempts
to fill Frank's shoes, and their animosity is heighted when Dave freezes during
an enemy attack.  While the three men deal with the loss of their buddy, Dave
falls in love with a young nurse named Anne (Sigrid Thornton, who played
Jessica in THE MANY FROM SNOWY RIVER and its sequel), who had taken care of
Dave when he was wounded at one point.  Dave eventually transfers to the
medical corps, which conveniently puts him close to Anne.  The film concludes
with a full-scale recreation of the final charge on Beersheeba.
     This premise allows the film to incorporate at least two factors that
characterize many of the Australian films that have been exported to the US.
The first is the same rugged stoicism and basic masculinity of Australian men
who make their home in the untamed frontier -- the Marlboro Man come to life --
that is seen in Australian films like MAD MAX 2 [THE ROAD WARRIOR] and
"CROCODILE" DUNDEE.  The second is the superb technical command of many
Australian filmmakers.  The Aussies are the ones who have consistently kept
alive the art of widescreen shot composition and stereophonic sound in the face
of the creeping influence of video.  Australian films like GALLIPOLI, DOGS IN
SPACE, and THE COCA-COLA KID have shown a remarkable dedication to the
masterful use of Cinemascope and Dolby Stereo.
     These two factors come into play most prominently in the last thirty
minutes of THE LIGHTHORSEMEN, when the soldiers make their assault on
Beersheeba.  The film has captured the sheer spectacle of the charge so well
that it rivals the chase scenes in MAD MAX 2.  Cinematographer Dean Semler used
a recently developed camera called a "hot head" -- a remote-controlled camera
fitted on the end of a mobile crane --  to film the men and horses in closeups
that put the viewer in the thick of the battle.  The widescreen closeups of
horses' hooves are tightly edited with shots counterposing the two forces, and
the result is quite thrilling to watch.  The sound effects, stereo
manipulation, and music by Mario Millo combine to make this the only memorable
scene in the film.
     The rest of the film can easily be thrown away because it serves little
purpose other than expanding the film to feature length and giving viewers
hooks to hang their emotions on.  While the premise may seem reasonably
intelligent, the stupid cliches start early.  The film can't have Dave be seen
as a wimp, so Dave proves his manhood and wins over his three partners by
rescuing some horses during an enemy airplane attack.  When Dave awakens in a
hospital after being wounded, the first person he sees is Anne.  The look in
their eyes and the love theme on the soundtrack tell the viewer instantly that
a solid and everlasting romance has begun -- just like in the movies.  Neither
bravery nor love is intrinsically cliched, but the random way the filmmakers
throw scenes and plot elements onto the screen reduces the emotions to
extraordinarily hollow shells reeking of gratuitous idiocy.  It is downright
insulting to include nice moonlit shots of Dave and Anne walking hand-in-hand
by the seashore in a film that is trying to convey the sweat and grit of 800
soldiers who won despite impossible odds.
     And there's no mistaking that portraying the glory of the Australian
victory is supposed to be the main thrust of scriptwriter Ian Jones' efforts.
According to the publicity materials, Jones interviewed many veterans of the
attack and came to view the film as a labor of love.  But whatever modicum of
researched reality is present is constantly destroyed by the cheap emotions
offered by director Simon Wincer and Jones.  For instance, the only character
in the film who doesn't have an identifying label pinned on the forehead is
Major Meinertzhagen (Anthony Andrews).  He's a slippery and enigmatic
intelligence officer who devises a clever ruse to confuse the enemy about the
Lighthorsemen's actual target.  He purposely wanders close to enemy territory
and, when chased by enemy troops, leaves behind forged documents indicating the
Australians will attack a target several miles away from Beersheeba.  This does
in fact create suspense, and it seems as though there's yet some hope left for
the film.
     But then the film degenerates again into stupidity: it turns out that
Meinertzhagen also included a love letter supposedly from his beau back home
but written in reality by Anne earlier in the film.  When the Turkish officer
reads the letter, he is struck by how beautiful and loving the letter is.  Such
a tender letter can come only from a most pure and honest heart, he decides --
and on the basis of that flimsy evidence concludes that the documents are
genuine and orders massive troop movements away from Beersheeba to the false
target.  This is all too typical of how ludicrously sentimentalized the whole
film is.  Perhaps Meinertzhagen did in fact conduct the operation this way, but
the way Wincer and Jones portray it leaves one gasping in outraged disbelief.
      Even worse, the politics of the film are thoroughly muddled by the
fundamental ambivalence with which Wincer and Jones have infused the film.  To
one hand, they want Australians to feel patriotic pride for their country's
military victory.  To the other, they include throw-away lines to satisfy the
pacifists in the audience.  When an aide tells the commander of the
Lighthorsemen how great it is that only 30 Australians died in the attack, the
commander leans back on his haunches and pompously proclaims, "Not if you're
one of them."  It's difficult not to gag in disgust at how obligatory and
empty the commander's line seems -- especially when the first words of the end
credits proudly inform the audience that not a single horse was injured or
killed in the making of the film.  And there's no larger significance at all to
the film's depiction of Dave's refusal to shoot another human being.  It would
have been far better to eliminate the subplot entirely rather than to give mere
lip-service to anti-war sentiments that were so movingly portrayed in films
like GALLIPOLI and PATHS OF GLORY.  Even the laughably ultra right-wing war
films like THE GREEN BERETS and RED DAWN didn't trivialize or cheapen the
principles of pacifism the way THE LIGHTHORSEMEN does.
     A final example: in Lewis Milestone's ALL QUIET ON THE WESTERN FRONT
(1930), there is a scene where some soldiers comment on how good it is to go
swimming since they haven't been able to bathe in three weeks.  That one
comment is quite telling about the enormous hardships and difficulties that the
fighting men had to face.  In THE LIGHTHORSEMEN, there's a similar scene where
the soldiers cavort nude on horseback at a seaside R & R station.  But once
again the film implodes into a ball of fluff.  The film conveys no sense of why
the men would be eager to grab any opportunity to discard their heavy weapons
and dirty clothes.  Instead all one sees is a bunch of men happily running
around naked on the beach.
     All these out-of-place scenes may lead one to think that perhaps the film
is supposed to be a comedy about war, like John Boorman's recent HOPE AND
GLORY.  But whereas that excellent film used such scenes to debunk the myths of
war, THE LIGHTHORSEMEN in fact employs them to create new legends -- and fails
miserably.  Aside from the well-shot final attack scene, the film does
embarrassingly little credit to its Australian cinematic heritage and ends up
being distastefully and stupefyingly mindless.
     Simon Wincer seems to like horses.  Both PHAR LAP and THE LIGHTHORSEMEN
feature horses prominently.  Wincer was also an executive producer of both THE
MAN FROM SNOWY RIVER and its sequel, which may help to explain why both of
those films are equally as juvenile as THE LIGHTHORSEMEN.  He has also directed
over 200 hours of Australian television, including the two mini-series
"Against the Wind" and "The Sullivans."
(*)  This running time does not include approximately 10 minutes of footage
that was cut from the film for its American release.  Inquiries directed to
both RKO Pictures and Cinecom have failed to determine precisely which one
edited the film.  See the accompanying interview with actor Peter Phelps for
more information about the content of the missing footage.

Title
Review for Sagolandet (1988)
With Johanna, Rollo May, Ingvar Carlsson, Tage Erlander, Gert Wilen,
Lars Svelander, Timo Nilsson, Henry Karlsson, Dorte Hansen, Per-Olof Hakannson,
Harold Lundstrom, Einar Carenfeldt, Stig Karlsson, Anita Grede, Seved Werntoft,
Lars Norrman, Hideaki Yoshiguchi, Britta Nylander, Anna-Lisa Floren,
Nils Erik Ahmansson, Edvin Bladh, The Sprung Family, and many others.
Credits:  Directed and photographed by Jan Troell.  Executive producer: Bengt
Linne. Assistant producer: Goran Setterberg.  Assistants: Mischa Gavrjusjov,
Botvid Kihlman, Agneta Ulfsater.  Original music by Tom Wolgers.
     Ever since Ingmar Bergman retired from active filmmaking, most Americans
have had precious little contact with Swedish cinema.  In fact, Lasse
Hallstrom's MITT LIV SOM HUND ("My Life as a Dog") is the only Swedish film to
have recently gained commercial distribution in the United States.  Ironically,
that charming and poignant film reintroduced Americans to Swedish cinema just
as a wave of quality Swedish filmmaking was ending.  Swedish cinema went into a
slump in the mid 1980s, and -- like the state of American cinema during the
1930s -- quietly ambitious documentaries like Stefan Jarl's UHKKADUS ("Threat")
have since become the prime source for innovation and vitality in Sweden today.
     Jan Troell's SAGOLANDET ("Land of Dreams") is another of these new
documentaries, but there is nothing quiet about it.  In less than ten minutes
it completely surpasses any expectations one might have for a 185-minute
documentary about life in modern-day Sweden.  At once intensely personal and of
universal value, the film is a masterpiece of lyricism that transcends its
immediate relevance: the film not only keeps the spirit of originality and
creativity alive but also sets a new standard of excellence for documentary
filmmaking.  The film is so successful as a whole that its momentary lapses are
easily forgiven and quickly forgotten.
     Time and time again, Troell's film paints a bleak picture of Sweden as a
nation where order, rationality, and efficiency take precedence over happiness,
joy, and imagination.  Troell also protests that the long record of human
violence against the environment has in turn dehumanized humans themselves, and
the film yearns for a "Land of Dreams" that would encourage people to explore
their individual potential rather than stifle it.  This theme might be
summarized as the value of imagination versus the benefits of rationality, and
Troell addresses it with considerably more thought and attention than the
typical get-back-to-nature message or simplistic anti-technology diatribe.
Furthermore, Troell is eminently successful in translating the film's thematic
generalities into terms particularly relevant to the Sweden of today.
     Sweden can be rightly proud of its rich artistic heritage, considering
that it has produced such international giants (among others) as Strindberg in
the theater and Sjostrom and Bergman in the cinema.  It would be easy for
foreigners to conclude that any country able to produce such world-reknowned
artists must have something special going for it, and there is indeed something
fascinating about Swedish culture.  It is difficult to pin down, but part of
what makes Sweden so intriguing is its strong liberal tradition.  Following
that tradition, the country has made giant strides toward securing political
and economic security for all its citizens.  In fact, progressive reformers in
other countries have long pointed to Sweden as the success story of the modern
welfare state.
     At the same time, however, few foreigners seem to realize that Sweden's
longstanding material prosperity has brought along with it a certain sense of
coldness, emptiness, and even sterility.  This is the fundamental contradiction
of Swedish culture, and Troell astutely recognizes that it has several
dimensions, ranging from the broadly political and economic to the personal and
practical.  As a Swede himself, Troell explores all of these considerations
from inside out and gives passionate expression to their implications.
     Because Troell engages his viewers with both personal and cultural
introspection, his film is already praiseworthy in and of itself.  If that were
all he wanted to do, however, he might as well have written a book or acted out
a drama on stage.  What makes Troell's work into into a particularly valuable
work of cinema is the intimate and symbiotic relationship between the film's
cinematic styles and Troell's reasons for making the film.  Each benefits the
other, and Troell consistently manipulates the two brilliantly.
     Consider, for example, just the first five minutes of the film.  The film
begins with a ground-level closeup of a red flower waving back and forth in the
wind.  An unseen adult male narrator (presumably Troell himself) says in
Swedish that "As a child I would stand in the grass with outstretched arms, my
face toward the sun.  Then I'd close my eyes, and spin 'round, 'round...  I
felt then, that I experienced God."  The film cuts to a slow-motion shot of a
young boy jumping around in a field of white flowers in obvious delight.  On
the soundtrack, a piano softly plays "Twinkle, Twinkle, Little Star."
     Then the film cuts to a right-profile shot of a well-dressed elderly man
who speaks in English with an American accent: "Joy is the experience of
something new, that one has not known before.  Happiness is the fulfillment of
one's past aims.  The joy is the the discovery of new aims, the sense of being
in a new country."  The film cuts back to the young boy jumping and twirling
about, again in slow motion.  This time, two puppies cavort at his feet with
him, and the final movement of Beethoven's Choral Symphony is heard joyously on
the soundtrack.
     Abruptly, the music stops and the film cuts to a full-body shot of a
scarecrow made of some black clothes erected on a wooden cross.  Ominous
synthesizer chords begin to play on the soundtrack.  The camera zooms back
slowly to show the bleak, barren landscape that the scarecrow guards.  Then the
title SAGOLANDET appears on-screen, written in large black letters that are
split vertically in half like early computer printout characters.  The letters
fade and the film continues on.
     Clearly, Troell is combining lyrical moments with strong documentary
footage in these scenes, and he makes the most each element: The opening
narration over the red flower immediately stresses the value of childlike
imagination and wonder.  Troell drives home the difference between joy and
happiness by delimiting the elderly man's observations between shots of the boy
twirling about happily.  (The man is, by the way, the American psychiatrist
Rollo May, and Troell relies on him heavily throughout the film.)  The bleak
field suggests the spiritual emptiness of the rational landscape because it
allows environmental folly, exemplified by the barren field, to occur.
Finally, the computer-like font of the title letters creates tension by
suggesting that the film is a down-to-earth documentary examination of a
thoroughly mystical or magical place -- the "Land of Dreams."
     The above analysis, though, barely begins to convey the tightly coherent
structure Troell has created by editing 80 hours of raw footage down to 185
minutes.  Just after the opening credits are over, for example, Troell includes
footage of a dog show.  Some time later, the film shows loggers using a large
machine to cut down forest trees in less than 10 seconds each.  Another
sequence follows a professional dogkiller (at a dog pound) as he calmly
explains their policy on putting stray dogs to death.  A third sequence
explains how loggers use a powerful bolt gun to shoot glyphosate capsules into
birch and aspen trees.  The glyphosate slowly kills the trees to make room for
more profitable pine trees.  The same bolt gun, the film shows, is used by the
dog pound to dispatch stray dogs "instantly" and "painlessly."  These seemingly
disparate moments are in reality closely related because they show how the
single-minded pursuit of efficiency can transform passive dominance (of humans
over nature) into active destruction.  Troell is at his poetic best while
pointing out such relationships, and the above sequence is but one example of
how intricately Troell has linked segments of his film together.
     In terms of overall structure, the film is divided into several sections.
Each section focuses on a specific place, idea, or group of individuals and
then cuts back to quiet philosophical commentary by Rollo May (the American
psychiatrist) or political arguments between Ingvar Carlsson and Tage Erlander.
With impeccable documentary technique, Troell gets his subjects to open up to
the camera, and his editing zeroes in on the essence of each conversation.  Who
is being interviewed is nowhere near as important as what he or she is saying,
and so most Americans won't realize that Carlsson is the prime minister of
Sweden and that Erlander is a former prime minister -- which is as it should
be.  Neither look like, talk like, or act like typical politicians, which is
probably why Troell was interested in interviewing them in the first place.
     Also seen throughout the film is Johanna, Troell's young daughter, whom
Troell began photographing from birth.  In the film, he shows her learning to
walk, climbing stairs, riding happily on a circus merry-go-round.  Not once,
however, does the film resemble a home movie.  Rather, Troell photographs
Johanna to express his own joy -- in the true Rollo May sense of the word -- at
becoming a father for the first time at age 50.  Troell can share his intensely
personal emotions with viewers in a meaningful way because espousing the value
of those feelings is precisely the point of Troell's film.  The presence of
Johanna throughout the film powerfully underscores how inseparable Jan Troell
is from his film.  The two are one and the same.
     No other filmmaker in recent memory has created an intimate document with
so broad a value as this.  SAGOLANDET supplants factual objectivity with poetic
creativity and therefore works in markedly different ways from the typical
cinema verite documentary.  While one might not wholly agree with Troell's
point of view or the film's numerous arguments, the film that flows from
Troell's convictions -- judged as a work of art -- is an indisputable
masterpiece.  In addition, the film embodies the very same qualities that it
says are missing from Swedish society, and therefore the film preserves its
integrity and consistency at the same time that it adopts a leadership role.
Few documentaries can claim to accomplish as much.  For all of these reasons,
and for many others left out, SAGOLANDET is a crowning achievement of
international cinema and a supreme personal triumph for Jan Troell.  One can
only wonder to what heights Troell might climb from here.
Filmography of Jan Troell:
[English translation and alternative titles in brackets.
 'S' indicates a short film.]
     Jan Troell is a veteran Swedish filmmaker who is well-known for lyricism
in his work.  Born in Malmo in 1931, he taught in an elementary school in Malmo
during the early 1950s and made instructional films for children in the late
1950s.  He began making documentaries for Swedish television in the 1960s and
made his feature film debut in 1966.  He belongs to the generation of Swedish
filmmakers (such as Bo Widerberg) that came of age in the 1960s, and he
photographs all his films himself.

Title
Review for Wannseekonferenz (1984)
Cast: Robert Artzorn, Friedrich Beckhaus, Gerd Bockmann, Jochen Busse,
Hans W. Bussinger, Harald Dietl, Peter Fitz, Reinhard Glemnitz, Dieter Groest,
Martin Luttge, Anita Mally, Dietrich Mattausch, Gerd Rigauer, Franz Rudnick,
Gunter Sporrle, Rainer Steffen.
Credits: Directed by Heinz Schirk.  Produced by Manfred Korytowski.
Executive Producer: Siegfried B. Gloker.  Screenplay by Paul Mommertz.
Director of Photography: Horst Schier.  Historical Advisor: Shlomo Aronson,
University of Jerusalem.  Editor: Ursula Mollinger.  Sound Engineer:
Sigbert Stark.  Art Direction by Robert Hofer-Ach & Barbara Siebner.
Costumes: Diemut Remy.  Production Manager: Jochen Riedel.
     Just about everyone knows how terrible the Holocaust was.  But it's not
something that most people think about other than in casual terms.  The sheer
numbers of those killed and the barbarity of Auschwitz numb the mind.  These
horrors are so immense that they loom large and become monolithically
unfathomable.
     But it is important to remember that those who set this brutally efficient
extermination of machine in motion were not robots or animals, but humans.  It
is simple and comforting to dismiss those Nazis who established and maintained
the concentration camps as sub-human beasts.  But they were not.  They were
alive, and they were human, with flesh and blood that differs little from you
or me.
     That's a scary thought.  It's scary because we like to think that we are
above such things, that we could never jump into the same trap they did.  Even
our broadest and most forgiving concept of humanity has to be stretched to the
limit when it comes to fitting in the Nazis.
     It's concerns like these that often inspire artists to give expression and
meaning to the immense human despair and sacrifice they have witnessed.  The
amount that has been written about the Holocaust over the last forty years is
staggering, and the number of films, poems, and memorials seem to keep growing.
Who has not seen at some point in their life photographs of the ovens and
bone-thin survivors and the plaques that boldly proclaim "NEVER AGAIN"?
     Sadly, these kinds of polemics are not enough.  All too often, their
moralizing and didactic tone distance the viewer or reader from the true
importance of what is being said.  And that makes it all too easy for adults to
dismiss these images as trite because "it couldn't happen again."  The recent
emergence of those who would revise history by denying that the Holocaust
happened at all is at least partially attributable to our growing collective
amnesia brought on by an ongoing disregard for increasingly perfunctory
warnings.
     The philosopher Hannah Arendt once wrote on the "banality of evil" and
its manifestations.  There is at least one film that understands how to apply
this concept to the Nazis.  It is THE WANNSEE CONFERENCE, a film made for
German television in 1984.  It is only now being shown in the United States.
     On January 20, 1942, fifteen high-ranking members of the Nazi government
attended a meeting in the upper-class Berlin suburb of Wannsee.  Until that
meeting, the extermination of the Jewish population was done primarily on an
ad-hoc basis.  The officials who gathered that day at 56-58 Am Grossen Wannsee
adopted the final solution as a formal, official policy.  Detailed minutes of
the meeting, including descriptions of the food and drink served and records of
informal conversations, were taken by a secretary who is still alive and living
in Germany.  (She refused to be interviewed by the filmmakers.)
     In 1961, Israeli-born producer Manfred Korytowski (best known in West
Germany for producing PUMUCKL, a television show for children that enjoys a
"Sesame Street" level of popularity) traveled to Israel to film a documentary
about the war-crimes trial of Adolf Eichmann (a conference participant).  While
there, he came across references to the Wannsee conference and soon discovered
the secretary's notes at Yad Vashem, the Holocaust Archives in Jerusalem.  His
interest aroused, he quickly concluded that the conference demanded a
definitive cinematic treatment.  After six years of intensive research, he
managed to accumulate letters about the conference from Heinrich Himmler and
Herman Goering as well as documents from the Nuremburg trials and Eichmann's
trial.  From these records, writer Paul Mommertz fashioned a dense screenplay
from which the film was made.  The film directly recreates the conference and
runs 85 minutes -- exactly the length of the actual meeting itself.
     The film's approach is opposite that taken by most films on the Nazis.  It
simply presents the Nazis as accurately as the records allow, without
commentary or narration.  As the conference gets under way, the men crack
jokes, flirt with the secretary, and drink cognac that the waiters bring out.
And all during the meeting, the discussion centers on how to best consolidate
the mechanisms for mass extermination under one command.
     Reinhard Heydrich, the chief of the Nazi Security Police and Secret
Service, who convened the meeting, becomes particularly pleased when the
conference participants readily agree to support his plans for implementing the
final solution.  Not only does it bolster his own political ambitions (he was
designated as Hitler's successor), but it masks the responsibility for the
decision behind a collective committee decision.
     Director Heinz Schirk makes no attempt to soften or highlight any of this.
He lets the meeting and the participants speak for themselves.  The most
telling comment of his own that he makes during the film is through his camera
work.  After showing the exterior of the house and a few other establishing
shots, the camera enters the conference room and does not emerge from the house
again until the end of the meeting and the film.  This is the primary element
responsible for attuning the audience to the supersensitized sense of reality
that pervades the film.
     While inside the room, the camera almost seems to adopt the emotional
characteristic of a Greek chorus, witnessing the events unflinchingly while
being unable to influence the seemingly inevitable outcome.  Near the beginning
of the film, the camera executes a complete rotation about the long rectangular
table at which the participants are seated.  The camera pans just slowly enough
to catch the flavor of the conversations it encounters, creating an eerie sense
of observing the events through a solid glass wall.  At one point, two men in
the foreground laugh at a joke about defiling a Jewish woman's vagina while the
secretary in the background winces and averts her eyes.  Most of the film is
presented matter-of-factly through this sort of mise-en-scene and detailed shot
composition.   And all of it is presented in real time.
     The actors were chosen for their physical resemblance to their characters,
but their acting skills are uniformly excellent as well.  While all the actors
work together to create a remarkable ensemble performance, Dietrich Mattausch
is particularly effective in portraying Reinhard Heydrich and his actions in
accessible terms.  He is disarmingly -- and disturbingly -- human while
reassuring the others who admit to having fainted or being uneasy about the
final solution.  The unification of actor and character is so complete that one
wonders how the actors kept themselves from being scarred emotionally while
trying to divorce themselves from their roles after the shoot.
     The filmmakers' demand for complete precision -- even the pens and watches
are accurate -- results in a copious use of Nazi jargon.  Nevertheless, one
need not know that "Reichsfuhrer S.S." refers to Heinrich Himmler to understand
the essence of what is being discussed.  The facial expressions, voice
cadences, and bodily mannerisms all have a universal value that can easily be
grasped.  Furthermore, the English subtitles have been culled from the best of
three separate translations (one original transcript, one by a poet, and one
rigorously accurate).
     Ultimately, however, what is most striking about the film and the events
it portrays is how casually it all happens.  One man came to the conference
from a shopping trip.  Another man leaves the conference to see why his dog is
barking outside, while the others inside continue to sip cognac and brandy.
And when a railway official complains that seat repair costs have been rising,
it all seems no different from any corporate board meeting -- until you realize
that the official is annoyed because the frozen bodies of Jews stuck to their
train seats in the cold cannot be removed without damaging the seats.
     It seems odd that a film as muted in style as this one could evoke strong
reactions.  As I left the theater, I wanted to scream in anger and disbelief.
How could these men, these people, these *humans* possibly talk about Jewish
people as though they were tools to be used for maximizing efficiency ratings?
How could they sit through such a morbid discussion?  Didn't even one person
have doubts or glimmer of conscience?  I just couldn't believe that the most
controversial issue they discussed was whether to kill half-Jews or merely to
sterilize them.
     But that exactly is the point.  This film disarmed me and prevented me
from raising any defense mechanisms.  The starkly human Nazis just stared at me
in the face, and I was transfixed, unable to look away.  This wasn't nine hours
of victims talking or pointing to Nazi horrors or mountains of facts and
figures, like Claude Lanzmann's SHOAH.  This was 85 minutes of pure
unadulterated scenes of the Nazis going about their business.  What could be
more damning than watching the Nazis from the inside?  Even Louis Malle's
recent heartfelt film AU REVOIR LES ENFANTES showed the Gestapo from the
outside, as monolithic entities.
     I was stunned as I left the theater.  All of the thoughts I wrote about
above came crashing down on me to the point that I couldn't think about
anything else for the rest of the day.  I was not able to get the final freeze
frame of a Nazi playing with his dog out of my mind.  A German shepherd lunges
for a stick in the man's raised hand while a sharply pungent piano chord -- in
the only use of music in the film -- accompanies the image.  Six months after
having seen the film at the Boston Film Festival, I still can't forget.  I know
I never will.

Title
Review for Whales of August, The (1987)
Cast: Bette Davis, Lillian Gish, Vincent Price, Ann Sothern, Harry Carey, Jr.,
Frank Grimes, Frank Pitkin, Mike Bush, Margaret Ladd, Tisha Sterling, and Mary
Steenburgen.
Credits: Directed by Lindsay Anderson.  Produced by Carolyn Pfeiffer and Mike
Kaplan.  Written by David Berry, based on his play.  Executive Producer: Shep
Gordon.  Director of Photography: Mike Fash, B.S.C.  Production Designer:
Jocelyn Herbert.  Music by Alan Price.  Editor: Nicolas Gaster.  Art Directors:
K.C.  Fox and Bob Fox.  Costume Designer: Rudy Dillon.
     When two screen legends like Lillian Gish and Bette Davis appear in a film
together in a film like THE WHALES OF AUGUST, it is virtually impossible not to
take notice.  Between the two of them, they have made over 200 films over more
than 100 years of combined acting experience.  Ms.  Gish, who is now 88
(according to her), started making films way back in 1912 when she and her
sister Dorothy were introduced to D. W. Griffith, who hired them immediately.
Ms. Davis (currently 79 years old) has had no less a legendary career,
spanning more than 55 years in the film world.  The problem when stars of this
caliber collaborate together -- at any age or point in their respective careers
-- is, of course, that respect and admiration can easily degenerate into
heroine worship.  While it is necessary to retain a healthy awareness and
appreciation for the past, each individual performance and film should be
evaluated on its own merits
     Even accepting that premise, however, it is difficult to criticize THE
WHALES OF AUGUST without appearing heartless or insensitive.  Given all the
odds and barriers against such a film being made in the first place, the fact
that THE WHALES OF AUGUST was completed is a minor miracle in its own right.
And yet, it has to be acknowledged that such a feat by itself isn't necessarily
enough.  This film is more of a coda or a recapitualization of the careers of
Gish and Davis, rather than a crowning artistic triumph of the skills of two
remarkable actresses.  While it is a sheer joy to see Gish and Davis back on
the screen, their return is less than satisfactory due to the failures of the
narrative vehicle.
     During the course of its 90 minutes, the film continuously develops its
premise and introduces its characters, with dramatic conflict arising only in
its final third.  The script, adapted by David Berry from his own stage play,
concerns Sarah (Ms. Gish) and Libby (Ms. Davis), two elderly sisters who have
spent the past 60 summers together without fail in the same house on an island
near the coast of Maine.  Their favorite pasttime since childhood has been to
watch for whales that appear each year late in the summer.  Their husbands have
both died, and their children have grown and established themselves elsewhere,
leaving Sarah and Libby to themselves.  Libby has become blind, and her health
is rapidly failing, forcing her to rely on Sarah's attention.
     Interestingly, the character of the two sisters parallels to a striking
degree the respective personality of Ms. Gish and Ms. Davis.  Just as Ms. Davis
has fought tooth and nail much of her way through Hollywood and Ms. Gish has
always been outwardly soothing and forgiving, so too is the appropriately named
Libby Strong an acerbic, independent, and abrasive companion to the the kindly
Sarah Webber, whose happy spirits are rarely perturbed.
     After Sarah and Libby are first seen, the supporting characters are
introduced and developed one by one.  Vincent Price plays a Russian expatriate
gentleman who is searching for a place to live since his landlady just recently
died.  Ann Sothern plays Tisha Doughty, a good friend of Sarah and Libby who
used to watch for whales with them in their childhood.  Harry Carey, Jr. plays
an oafish and clumsy carpenter friend who just can't avoid making noise every
time he moves a limb.  With a plethora of scenes to describe their day to day
activities -- fishing, conversing, and taking afternoon tea seem to be few
delights left to them -- the filmmakers's introduction of the supporting cast
into the flow of the film creates an intelligent and three-dimensional
depiction of the relatively isolated lives Sarah and Libby lead together on the
island.
     Ms. Gish and Ms. Davis both shine in their roles during these parts, and
although Ms. Gish has considerably more screentime than Ms. Davis, their
contrasting personalities complement each other quite well.  Their chemistry
with the other actors is somewhat staid at a few points in the film, but it is
always believable and in several moments, quite touching.  When Sarah
cautiously leans over to pick up an item that has fallen on the floor, it is
almost heartbreaking to realize just how old and frail she really is and the
toll caring for her sister must have taken.  Similarly, when Libby is first
seen, she almost looks like a ghost with her long flowing white hair and dark
blank eyes.  But instead of appearing frightening or startling, Ms. Davis
makes Libby endearing and strangely sympathetic, even as she macabrely brushes
her cheek with a lock of her long-deceased husband's hair.
     However, instead of simply letting this sensitive portrayal speak for
itself, the filmmakers decide to uproot the most fascinating aspects of their
character study.  They make the all-too-typical mistake of trying to inject
drama and plot into the course of events.  Libby keeps insisting to Sarah that
their lives are over, although ironically, the very vehemence with which she
makes this proclamation belies her fatalism and shows the life remaining behind
those unseeing eyes.  Sarah, to the other hand, must decide whether she will
reaffirm her commitment to care for her sister or whether she will leave Libby
in the unwilling care of her rich daughter.  This conflict is, however, a
wholly transparent one because both the filmmakers and the audience know that
Sarah realizes what the only acceptable choice is.  Thus, efforts to create
suspense and drama simply unravel and fall flat.
     The failure of the filmmakers' approach is all the more striking since
they completely separate the essential question facing Sarah and Libby from the
other characters.  It is Libby, and not Sarah or any other character, who
allows the conflict to be smoothly resolved.  (The only event of substance
influenced by a member of the supporting cast comes when Tisha assumes that
Sarah wants to sell her house and asks a real estate agent to appraise the
house.)  This virtual irrelevance of the supporting characters to the drama
reduces the conflict to a hackneyed, obligatory, and insulting level --
especially considering how roundly all of the characters are portrayed.
Director Lindsay Anderson and David Berry would have accomplished a great deal
more if they had submerged the film's conflict into the character portrayal
rather than bringing it to the forefront so clumsily.
     On a technical level, the film has a few minor errors.  For instance, the
lighting scheme during a nighttime scene is inconsistent from one shot to the
next, and in at least two instances, the technical trickery used to overcome
visual defects is apparent.  The first comes immediately after Sarah puts down
a photograph viewer -- her head seems to lose its posture in slow motion as the
camera cuts away.  The second comes in the form of what appears to be a few
missing frames (in the photographic negative, not the positive print) during a
shot of Sarah lighting a candle for a dinner party.  The seam is slight, but it
is quite noticeable.  These are, however, relatively minor errors, and the joy
of seeing Ms. Gish and Ms. Davis back at work overcomes blemishes like these
that do appear.
     More worthy of comment is the filmic style of the director.  Mr. Anderson
is aware that the emphasis of this film is properly on the actors, and he
accordingly tones down the cinematic devices.  The result is quite conventional
but surprisingly effective.  Particularly representative of this is the film's
pre-credit sequence in black and white.  It depicts Sarah, Libby, and Tisha in
their childhood waiting and watching for whales on the same island.  The film
then dissolves from a black and white image of a bell-ringing buoy in the
harbor to a full-color image of the same bell more than half a century later.
This is a rather obvious technique, but it manages to convey at once both the
passage of time as well as the stability and calm of the island's unchanging
features.  The rest of the film is photographed in the same restrained yet
skillful style.  (Even when the camera follows at the heels of Sarah as she
walks across her front porch, it does so only briefly.)  Mr. Anderson deserves
credit for maintaining his sensitivity here, something that could have easily
been overlooked by another director.  Also noteworthy in the face of the
creeping influence of video is his use of the entire 1.85 frame to full effect,
especially during the conversations in Sarah's living room.
     What Mr.  Anderson deserves the most credit for, however, is for reuniting
audiences with Ms. Gish and Ms. Davis.  Directing is hardly ever an easy task,
and Mr. Anderson's courage at agreeing to direct a film fraught with so many
possibilities for mishap must be recognized.  His film does offer many
memorable pleasures, which fans of these two legendary stars will no doubt
appreciate.  Ms. Gish and Ms. Davis are two of the few remaining actors or
actresses who warrant enough respect to enable audiences to indulge the glaring
narrative faults of the film's script.  Still, it is unfortunate that these two
luminaries of the silver screen are forced to rely on their capital already
deposited with audiences, rather than demonstrating their considerable talents
to a new generation of viewers.  It is only fair that Mr. Anderson and Mr.
Berry bear the bulk of the responsibility for that failure as well as the
lion's share of accolades for returning Ms. Gish and Ms. Davis to their fans.
Lindsay Anderson was born in India and educated at Oxford.  He advocated
radical departures from traditional British filmmaking attitudes as co-editor
of the influential film magazine SEQUENCE.  Although he started making films
completely by accident, his documentaries and shorts have won awards and
critical acclaim, and his film IF...  won the Palm D'Or at Cannes.  His
previous films have dealt with violent upheavals and drastic changes, in almost
complete opposition to the stately and restrained style of THE WHALES OF
AUGUST.  He greatly admires John Ford, saying that "In Ford there are tensions
between tradition and independence which I recognize in myself."

Title
Review for Unbearable Lightness of Being, The (1988)
Cast: Daniel Day-Lewis, Juliette Binoche, Lena Olin, Derek de Lint,
Erland Josephson, Pavel Landovsky, Donald Moffat, Daniel Olbrychski,
Stellan Skarsgard, Tomek Bork, Bruce Myers, Pavel Slaby, Pascale Kalensky,
Jacques Ciron, Anne Lonnberg, Laszlo Szabo, Vladimir Valenta, Clovis Cornillac,
Leon Lissek, Consuelo de Haviland.
Credits: Directed by Philip Kaufman. Produced by Saul Zaentz. Screenplay by
Jean-Claude Carriere and Philip Kaufman. Adapted from the Milan Kundera novel.
Directory of Photography: Sven Nykvist, A.S.C. Supervising Film Editor: Walter
Murch. Costume Design: Ann Roth. Production Design: Pierre Guffroy. Original
music and arrangements by Mark Adler. Musical selections from the works of Leos
Janacek.
     Upon examining the list of credits for this film, bells and lights should
be going off in every direction.  Saul Zaentz (AMADEUS, ONE FLEW OVER THE
CUCKOO'S NEST) produced.  The film was shot by Sven Nykvist, the "painter with
light" who has won universal praise for his work with Ingmar Bergman and other
directors.  The film was edited under the watchful eye of Walter Murch, who won
Oscars and acclaim for his editing and sound work in films like APOCALYPSE NOW,
THX-1138, and THE CONVERSATION.  The cast is a potpourri of prominent and
excellent actors from England, Czechoslovakia, France, Sweden, and Holland.
The director, Philip Kaufman, is American; he's known mainly for the 1978
remake of INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS and THE RIGHT STUFF.  Finally, the
script is based on the internationally reknowned novel written in 1984 by Milan
Kundera, a Czechoslovakian expatriate living in France.  Seeing the list of all
that high-power talent is almost enough to make the breath quicken and the
mouth water; the potential for greatness seems ready to explode in an artistic
flowering.
     Then the intrigue of the subject matter arises: just what is a film with a
title like "The Unbearable Lightness of Being" about?  One borrows a copy of
the novel from a friend to satiate the desire to know.  On a strict narrative
level, it turns out that the book concerns the erotic liaisons between a
brilliant brain surgeon in Czechoslovakia named Tomas, his wife Tereza, and his
mistress Sabina, as well as Sabina's lover Franz.  But this is no trashy
Harlequin Romance.  Their romantic exploits are set against the 1968 Soviet
invasion of their homeland, which abruptly terminated the newly-found artistic
and political freedoms during the period of "socialism with a human face" known
as the Prague Spring.
     But then an unpleasant realization sinks in.  The path from the novel,
which quite deserves all the praise it has been given, to a film is fraught
with many possible missteps.  Why?  Because interspersed within the romance and
politics are Kundera's numerous philosophical asides and metaphysical
discussions -- which form the real core and gem of the novel.  Consider this
excerpt from Part Two (which is entitled "Body and Soul"):
     Even in this abridged passage, one can see how deftly Kundera integrates
his ruminations with his character's actions.  That is what gives the novel and
its title substance and depth; no other novel in recent memory about the
travails of young lovers begins with a three-page reflection on Nietzchean idea
of eternal return and Parmenides' division of the world into pairs of
opposites.  And Kundera's remarkable word choices and striking juxtapositions
elevate the novel to its proper place as a great work of modern literature.
     But therein lies the problem with the film: any filmmaker, no matter how
talented, will most likely be at a loss as how to transfer the full richness of
the above excerpt to the filmic medium.  The best one can probably hope for is
an intelligent and sensitive recounting of the narrative in a manner that
remains faithful to the more metaphysical aspects of the book.  While Ingmar
Bergman or Alain Resnais (HIROSHIMA MON AMOUR) might be the first choice to
guide the novel to the screen, Philip Kaufman and his actors leave no doubt
that they have made as good a film as possible from as unfilmable a novel as
this.  Unfortunately, the film leaves one hanging for more.
     Perhaps the best scene in which this becomes evident is the scene near the
beginning after Tereza has just unexpectedly arrived at Tomas' apartment in
Prague.  As she and Tomas make love for the first time, she screams loudly in
his ear.  In the book, the scream "was not an expression of sensuality....
What was screaming is fact was the naive idealism of her love trying to banish
all contradictions, banish the duality of body and soul, banish perhaps even
time."  In the film, however, all one hears is Tereza shouting for a second or
so.  There is no indication whatsoever of the metaphysical significance of
Tereza's screams.  This is indicative of how straightforward the narrative has
been made in the film, and it is painful to sit through knowing that so much is
lacking on the screen.  The book's central categorization of all things into
"heavy" and "light" and Kundera's constant exploration of the boundaries of the
two is so subdued in the film as to be virtually absent.
     Yet what remains on the screen does have strengths of its own.  The acting
in the film is uniformly superb, from Daniel Day-Lewis as Tomas, French actress
Juliette Binoche as Tereza, and noted Swedish actress Lena Olin as Sabina down
to the few moments the popular Polish actor Daniel Olbrychski has onscreen as
an Interior Ministry official who tries to convince Tomas to recant an article
critical of the communists that Tomas had written years before.  Kaufman draws
thoroughly on the skills of his actors, and there is no mistaking that this
most American of directors has successfully produced a quintessentially
European character study.
     Technically, the film is dazzling in several moments.  In one scene,
Tereza hallucinates while swimming in a pool that the row of women exercising
at the poolside have been replaced by a grinning Tomas forcing the now nude
women to do squat-thrusts.  The camera shows the women from Tereza's point of
view as she alternately surfaces and dives into the water.  The crisp colors
and the sharp, seamless editing between the real and the unreal as the camera
bobs above and below the water surface makes up in visual appeal for the loss
of the inner meaning (explained in the book) of Tereza's hallucination.  
     Also, the sequence in which Tereza and Tomas photograph the Soviet tanks
and troops as they roll into Prague is a breathtaking cinematic tour-de-force.
Kaufman and his crew brilliantly integrate archival footage with their own
recreation of the Russian invasion -- complete with authentic clothing, props,
automobiles, and tanks.  Daniel Day-Lewis is even provided with a gold tooth
crown that was popular among Czech men at the time.  Kaufman's crew maintained
such a high degree of accuracy that Kundera, who lived through the invasion,
could not distinguish archival footage of the invasion from scenes of Kaufman's
recreation.  During this sequence, Kaufman integrates virtually every technical
aspect of filmmaking -- lighting, photography, editing, sound, color, art
direction, acting -- with such astonishing clarity that the sheer cinematic
strength of those scenes carries the film in a direction the book never could
have.
     And the narrative does manage to include some of Kundera's philosophical
gems.  In one dinner table conversation, Tomas castigates those who initially
welcomed the communist regime for not following the mythical example of
Oedipus, who, says Tomas, at least had the courage to punish himself (by
gouging out his eyes and leaving home) when he realized that he had killed his
father and slept with his mother.  Kaufman also deserves accolades for the
caring sensitivity with which he brings the nudity and eroticism of the book to
the screen.  That Kaufman manages to avoid cheap exploitation in an industry
that revels at every opportunity to increase box office appeal is in of itself
a major accomplishment.
     Unfortunately, by the end of the film's 168 minutes, all of the film's
inner strengths fail to compensate for the loss of the inner secrets of
Kundera's novel.  Kundera himself has said that "If the novel has a function,
it is to discover the ambiguity of things.  My obsession as a novelist is to
transform all answers into questions."  That ambiguity is, sadly, missing from
the screen translation.  Kaufman had the blessing of Kundera's intimate
involvement and approval of the choices he made while writing the script, and
Kaufman also benefited from Kundera's experience with filmmaking (Kundera was
once a professor at the Prague National Film School, where Milos Forman was
among his students).  With all the talent involved in the making of this film,
Kaufman has achieved what to him must be a supreme personal triumph.
Nevertheless, it is disappointing that one must be familiar with Kundera's
novel to fully appreciate the qualities that made the story of Tomas, Tereza,
Sabina, and Prague so memorably special.
As is undoubtedly apparent from the filmography, THE UNBEARABLE LIGHTNESS OF
BEING is a departure from the material that Philip Kaufman has previously worked
on (except, perhaps, for his 1983 adaptation of Tom Wolfe's bestseller).  His
films have only recently begun to attract critical attention.

Title
Review for My Life for Zarah Leander (1986)
Cast: Zarah Leander, Paul Seiler, Armand, Margot Hielscher, Rolf Hansen,
      Douglas Sirk, Michael Jary, Bruno Balz, Prof. Rolf Kutschera,
      Hans Weigel, Harold Prince, and Karl Schoenboeck
Credits: Director, Producer, Editor, Director of Photography, Sound:
         Christian Blackwood
     Zarah Leander, a Swedish-born chanteuse actress who became popular in
Germany during the reign of the Third Reich in the 1930s and 1940s, is the
subject of this fascinating documentary by Christian Blackwood.  The film
presents the enigmatic and multi-faceted personality of Zarah Leander through
both archival footage as well as the eyes of an obsessive fan of hers, Paul
Seiler.  This dual approach keeps alive the memory of a famous figure from the
past, but the film's value in exploring the private motivations of Zarah
Leander's fandom far exceeds its historical description of her stardom.
     Zarah Leander had unique features that attracted the attention and
adulation of many fans in Nazi Germany, especially in the homosexual community
of the time.  Her broad features, husky physique, and deep singing voice made
her a much more masculine presence than Marlene Deitrich.  She starred in a
series of melodramas that were revered by her fans, both for her acting and her
singing.
     She was frightened of growing old, and she repeatedly tried to stage
comebacks by singing her old hits to the accompaniment of her husband on the
piano.  The loss of her youthful beauty had unfortunately devastated her and
her career, and she could not understand why current audiences devoted their
attentions elsewhere.  Blackwood depicts her rise and fall through numerous
interviews with songwriters and directors who worked with her in the 1940s and
1950s.  He also shows footage from her films as well as concerts she gave after
her fame declined.
     Blackwood also presents interviews with Zarah Leander in which another
aspect of her personality becomes apparent: her complete lack of any political
compunctions against working within the Nazi regime.  In one particularly
telling scene, she says that the adulation that she received from her fans was
all that was important to her.  What her fans did the rest of the time, she
declares, was none of her concern.  This uncompromising refusal to accept
political realities undoubtedly was a factor in her decline as contemporary
audiences were loathe to revere a figure so closely identified with the Nazi
regime.
     But at one time she was quite famous.  Her ability to fascinate her
audience is shown in this film through Paul Seiler, a homosexual and a fan who
first heard Zarah Leander on Swiss radio in 1943 and finally met with her
personally in 1955.  He soon became her confidant, and she became the
"super-mother" figure he craved to replace the loss of his mother in childhood.
Paul Seiler plastered his apartment walls with photographs and articles about
her.  He would console her after a bad performance or critical review, and he
would follow her where ever her schedule demanded.  Her decline from fame and
death in 1981 had a severe effect on him.  While attending an auction of
clothing and other memorabilia associated with Zarah Leander, he becomes
outraged that other bidders consider the momentos of her life and career as
little more than collectors' items for their own aggrandizement.  Trying to
come to terms with her demise, he seeks out and talks with a male professional
Zarah Leander impersonator named Armand who sings her songs in a nightclub act.
As the film ends with the Armand singing many of the songs we saw Leander sing
earlier in the film, the admiration evident in Paul Seiler's face justifies and
gives meaning to the film's title.
     Technically, Blackwood does an acceptable job.  He found and inserted many
segments from Zarah Leander's films and concert footage.  He also has tracked
down and interviewed many people who knew Zarah Leander or were associated with
her rise to stardom, including Douglas Sirk who directed two of Leander's
biggest hits, TO NEW SHORES and LA HABANERA.  He uses freeze frames and
photographs with good effectiveness in parts.  However, one annoying problem
occurs in parts of the film.  Blackwood shot interview footage of Zarah
Leander, transferred it to videotape, and reshot it onto film as Paul Seiler
watches the videotape on a television in his living room.  Blackwood does this
to show us Paul Seiler's reactions to the footage in order to heighten our
understanding of his devotion.  However, the psychological effect is obscured
by the loss of resolution and color.  Blackwood himself invites comparison in
one or two instances when he zooms his camera into the television and then
segues into the actual footage itself (thereby eliminating the videotape step).
The small pallid image of Zarah Leander on the television set seems a much less
likely object of obsession than her richer, fuller image on direct film.
Blackwood should not have used videotape as an intermediate step.
     In terms of its narrative, the documentary does a good job in portraying
the life and times of a star from the past.  However, the more interesting
aspect of the film examines the effect she had on her fans, both past and
present.  The structure of the film is such that we are initially introduced to
the fact that Zarah Leander had and still has a loyal following.  This arouses
a curiosity as who this Zarah Leander person is and why she has such a
following.  Only after 30 minutes or so are we shown archival footage of her
films and concerts to give us an understanding of exactly who is being
discussed so reverently by her fans.  While portraying her decline and death,
the film constantly shifts its focus back to Paul Seiler.  He opens up to the
camera considerably and in several very moving scenes explains his personal
fondness for Zarah Leander.  His homosexuality, her husky masculine features,
and the loss of his mother at an early age are all discussed with such candor
and simplicity that the documentary is transformed into a very personal tribute
and love letter to Zarah Leander.  In one particularly touching moment, Paul
Seiler tells how he was unable to give Zarah Leander a birthday gift of
photographs and momentos of her career because she became more distant from him
as she grew older and faded from stardom.  She stopped returning his calls, and
he was not allowed to see her as often as before.  The sadness in Paul Seiler's
face as he recounts this turn of events humanizes the depth of his attachment
to her and the pain of separation after her decline.  While we may not share
his reverence for Zarah Leander, we certainly come to understand just how
deeply he loved her and why she exerted such an influence over him.
     The film rates two and a half (out of four) stars for going beyond a mere
historical representation of Zarah Leander's life.  However, the real star is
Christian Blackwood himself.  His ability as a film maker is apparent in this
film, and his work deserves wider recognition.  The insights presented with
discerning perception by Christian Blackwood into why someone would devote his
life to a masculine chanteuse actress who was closely identified with the Nazi
Party is the real heart of the film.
Partial Filmography of Christian Blackwood:
     Christian Blackwood's films have been shown at numerous film festivals and
on international television, winning many awards along the way.  His feature
film SAN DOMINGO, adapted from a novel by Kleist, won the Bundesfilmpreis for
1970 (the German Oscar award equivalent).  He has also made several commercials
for television and cinema as well as short films that are not listed above.

Title
Review for Decline of Western Civilization Part II: The Metal Years, The (1988)
Cast: Joe Perry, Steven Tyler (AEROSMITH); Alice Cooper; Gene Simmons,
Paul Stanley (KISS); Ian "Lemmy" Kilminster (MOTORHEAD); Ozzy Osbourne;
C. C.  DeVille, Bobby Dall, Bret Michaels, Rikki Rockett (POISON);
Bill Gazzarri; Chris Holmes (W.A.S.P.); Tawn Mastrey; Darlyne Pettinicchio;
Lizzy Borden, Gene Allen, Mychal Davis, J. Holmes, Joey Scott (LIZZY BORDEN);
Taime Down, Mark Michals, Brent Muscat, Eric Stacy, Greg Steele
(FASTER PUSSYCAT); Mark Burns, Chuck Andrews, David Black (SEDUCE); Randy O.,
Jeff Duncan, Shawn Duncan, Aaron Samson (ODIN); Nadir D'Priest, Lizzie Grey,
Frankie Jones, Brian West, Shea Darek (LONDON); Dave Mustaine, Dave Ellefson,
Jeff Young, Chuck Beehler (MEGADETH).
Credits: Directed by Penelope Spheeris.  Produced by Jonathan Dayton and
Valerie Faris.  Executive Producers: Miles Copeland III and Paul Colichman.
Editor: Earl Ghaffari.  Location Sound by Mark Hanes.  Director of
Photography: Jeff Zimmerman.  Additional Photography: Julio Macat.  Music
Supervisor: Seth Kaplan for O.S.S.  Additional Music Score: Simon Steele.
     In a film industry notorious for mindless and idiotic sequels to equally
moronic films, it is welcome -- and surprising -- news that this particular
sequel is cohesive, intelligently constructed, and eye-opening.  Penelope
Spheeris has directed fictional films before, but she is best remembered for
her 1981 documentary on the Los Angeles punk music scene at the time.  Her
fascination with music and documentary filmmaking pays off as she devotes her
talents this time around to exploring the world that heavy metal rockers and
their fans have created in current LA nightclubs.
     In this film, Spheeris mixes MTV-style concert footage with minimally
rehearsed interviews that take place against thoroughly planned backdrops.  One
member of KISS, for instance, is interviewed in a lingerie store, while the
other is photographed from above as he lies in a bed with three young women.
This technique provides more than enough realism during the interviews and also
avoids the monotony typical of most concert footage.  While this film is a
serious snapshot of the current LA metal scene -- it was shot between August
1987 and February 1988 -- the film is also reasonably entertaining to watch due
to the outrageous remarks made by many of the rockers.  Hard core metal addicts
will find it revealing to see how their idols look and behave offstage, while
appalled parents will undoubtedly find plenty more to be appalled at, what with
all the antics and attitudes on display.  Spheeris has certainly given a new
twist to the notion of a "family film."
     That the film is able to simultaneously support numerous points of view is
one of its best strengths.  This multifaceted approach of letting actions speak
for themselves is at the heart of cinema verite filmmaking, and it therefore
comes as no surprise that Spheeris cites as her primary cinematic influences
the giants of cinema verite: Frederick Wiseman, D. A. Pennebaker, and Ricky
Leacock (who created and headed the film department at MIT for many years).
Spheeris has even included some 16mm footage, which is, of course, the staple
of documentary filmmakers.
     But while the film is formally a documentary, it differs from cinema
verite in significant ways.  First and foremost, Spheeris and cinematographer
Jeff Zimmerman have shot much of their concert footage in a decidedly
MTV-style, complete with gyrating bodies and guitars, flashy camera movement,
unusual camera angles, and rapid editing.  Spheeris and editor Earl Ghaffari do
not let the film unfold as a surrogate MTV show, however.  They edit the music
video segments together (and the whole film) with an intelligence usually alien
to the form.
     The shooting and editing make clear that Spheeris is equally comfortable
making documentaries or handling music videos.  But that leads to the second
difference between cinema verite and this film, which could have been a serious
flaw but fortunately isn't.  Spheeris includes performances of Megadeth, a band
for whom she's previously made a video.  In addition, one of the bands in the
film, Seduce, was recently signed on by I.R.S. Records, which is a part of
I.R.S. World Media, the production company for the film.  In strict cinema
verite, even the appearance of a conflict of interest would be unthinkable and
unacceptable.  Happily, there is no evidence whatsoever that Spheeris has
compromised or otherwise adversely influenced the integrity and truthfulness of
what is shown onscreen, and consequently the film's relaxation of the harsh
discipline demanded by cinema verite can be forgiven easily.  This is
especially true considering that Spheeris quit her music video production
company because she became dissatisfied with "making commercials" and that most
film reviewers (this one included) would have had no idea of Spheeris' prior
involvement with the bands if the press materials had not mentioned it.
     The third and most notable difference between the film and a typical
verite documentary is that DECLINE II is, in Spheeris' own words, "funny and
entertaining, without being too frivolous."  Thus, the young rockers who
haven't made it yet offer some pretty outrageous comments about females,
success, sex, sexism, drugs, and the size of their penis.  One guitar player
has the words "Fuck the PMRC" written on his guitar.  And a middle-aged woman
from the only parents' group interviewed in the film (not the Parents Music
Resource Center) makes a fool of herself when an off-camera Spheeris asks her
whether Ozzy Osbourne really speaks for the devil.  Spheeris lays that ghost to
rest by immediately cutting to a shot of a plain and harmless-looking Osbourne
cooking breakfast in his own home where he opens his eyes wide and with an a
sarcastically evil grin answers "Yes!"  to the same question.  Of course,
Osbourne doesn't get off scot-free.  The years of jumping around on stage show
their toll when Osbourne cooks for himself what seems to be a pound of bacon
and can't pour orange juice into a glass without spilling much of it.
     Even so, Osbourne and the other veteran rockers in the film (such as
Aerosmith, Alice Cooper, and KISS) are much more clear headed and articulate
than the relative unknowns.  Whereas the younger set is wholly infatuated with
the image and perks of stardom and is thoroughly convinced that he or she was
meant to be a rock star, the older rockers have been there already and have
outgrown some of their more outlandish antics while still remaining hard core
metal rockers.  But just when one gets used to this dichotomy, the film takes
its most serious turn when Spheeris films a thoroughly intoxicated Chris Holmes
(guitarist for W.A.S.P.).  He's happily rotting his brain cells and life away
as he guzzles vodka while lying in a swimming pool -- while his mother
steadfastly looks on from the side, not saying a word.  Spheeris, to her
immense credit, refuses to sensationalize or moralize.  She just continues
asking questions from off camera, probing and pressing, letting the scene speak
for itself.  It's a moment worthy of the genius of Frederick Wiseman, and it is
much of the reason why THE DECLINE OF WESTERN CIVILIZATION PART II THE METAL
YEARS is as successful as it is.
Directorial Filmography of Penelope Spheeris:
  [`FD' indicates feature documentary.
   Alternate titles listed after a slash.]
A cousin of filmmaker Costa-Gavras, Penelope Spheeris grew up in the suburbs
of Orange County, California.  She worked for an educational film company
after graduating in 1973 from UCLA with a degree in Theatre Arts.  She then
set up her own music video company, Rock 'n' Reel, and directed videos for
four years.  She found herself working as West Coast producer for the
"Saturday Night Live" television show, including a series of short films by
comedian Albert Brooks.  In 1977, Brooks gave Spheeris her chance to produce
her first feature film, REAL LIFE.  Not satisfied with producing, she soon
returned to directing.

Title
Review for Kamigami no Fukaki Yokubo (1968)
Cast: Rentaro Mikuni, Choichiro Kawarazaki, Kazuo Kitamura, Kazuko Okiyama,
Yasuko Matsui, Yoshi Kato, Hosei Komatsu, Kanjuro Arashi, Chikako Hosokawa,
Chikage Ogi, Jun Hamamura.
Credits: Directed by Shohei Imamura.  Screenplay by Shohei Imamura and Keiji
Hasebe.  Adapted from the 1962 play PARAJI.  Cinematography by Masao Tochizawa.
Music by Toshiro Mayuzumi.  Art Direction by Takeshi Omura.
     Shohei Imamura has always liked making "messy, really human, Japanese,
unsettling films."  And he has done exactly that in KAMIGAMI NO FUKAKI YOKUBO
(THE PROFOUND DESIRE OF THE GODS), a film he made in 1968 that had to wait two
decades to be released in its full 170-minute version in the United States.
Using vivid color and and magnificent cinemascope photography, Imamura reaches
back to ancient myths to explore the incestual origins of human society in the
tiny island paradise of Kuragejima, in the Ryukyu Islands.  Imamura coalesces
all aspects of the film into a coherent whole with a supreme confidence that
permeates virtually every shot of his film.  Not until the short epilogue at
the end does this rare sort of masterful filmmaking go slightly astray.
     The film is defined by its six main characters, who form a microcosm of
both the island's past and its encroaching future.  Four of them are members of
the Futori family, which has a long history of engaging in taboo practices
(like incest) and being punished by both the gods and their fellow island
residents.  Because of this, they are commonly considered little more than
animals by the other islanders, and they are treated accordingly.  Twenty years
ago, Nekichi Futori (Rentaro Mikuni) was discovered having an incestuous
relationship with his sister Uma (Yasuko Matsui).  According to legend, the
gods showed their displeasure by hurling a huge boulder onto the island during
a terrible storm.  The islanders then chained Nekichi for his crimes and put
Uma in the care of the local noros (shamanesses).  To appease the wrath of the
gods, Nekichi has been digging a pit for the boulder to fall into for the past
twenty years, and the job is nearing completion.  Nekichi's son Kametaro Futori
(Choichiro Kawarazaki) is understandably confused about his heritage, since
Nekichi is the son of his own grandfather.  Kametaro is also uncertain about
his future career plans.  Kametaro's sister Toriko (Kazuko Okiyama) is mentally
retarded and is quite content to wander around in a burlap sack and to be used
sexually by island men.
     The other two main characters in the film are the village headman Ryugen
Ryu (Yoshi Kato), who manages a sugar mill on the island, and Mr. Kariya, an
engineer from Tokyo who is sent by his company to construct a water source for
the mill.  Kariya is, of course, the representative of civilization, and he
finds the local traditions and myths that obstruct his task to be
incomprehensible.  (As may be expected from this culture clash, Imamura draws a
few comedic moments with Kariya.)  Also in the film is grouchy Grandpa Futori
(Kanjuro Arashi), who eventually dies and returns from the grave in a
night-time vision seen by many of the islanders.  Finally, Tokuri the Balladeer
(Jun Hamamura) imparts the film with much of its mythic proportions through his
storytelling and songs.  For most of the film, Imamura calmly and casually
explores the idiosyncratic world of the Futoris and their life on Kuragejima
with an almost documentary-like style.
     But all throughout the film is an ongoing subtext that ultimately relates
back to the film's title.  Furthermore, that subtext is the heart of the film
and is crucially dependent on Imamura's camerawork.  Typical of how Imamura
constructs his shots is one scene where Kariya, Ryugen, and Kametaro (who has
become the engineer's helper) inspect a cliff for sources of water.  Most of
the scene is shot matter-of-factly from ground or eye level.  However, as the
three begin to inspect a hole already dug in the rock, Imamura abruptly shifts
the camera angle to an overhead shot.  On one edge of the cinemascope frame is
Kametaro and on the other edge are Ryugen and Kariya.  Because the sudden cut
is deliberate and repeated throughout the film, the scene strongly implies
that the three men are being watched by hidden, unseen forces.  And because
the camera photographs the three men precisely on the edges of the frame, it
seems as though the hidden forces are watching them through a perfectly
situated window that leads from one world to another.
     The question of who or what these hidden forces are -- the key to the
subtext -- is answered by numerous stylized shots of owls, lizards, birds,
snakes, and other animals.  (These shots are, by the way, good examples
Imamura's fascination with hybridizing documentary and dramatic styles.  He
first explored documentary authenticity in his 1963 film NIPPON KNOCHUKI [THE
INSECT WOMAN].)  The common factor linking most of the animal shots is that
Imamura repeatedly focuses on the animals' piercing eyes.  That -- and the fact
that Imamura includes them in the film at all -- transforms the creatures into
physical extensions of an omnipresent divinity constantly observing the island
from all directions.  This is especially apparent when an owl with bright
yellow eyes gazes steadily at the characters as they bumble around in a forest
late at night.  The cinematic link between nature and divinity is the
underlying structure that the entire film is based on, and indeed it is the key
to beauty of how Imamura documents the vagaries of human interaction and the
worlds in which they live -- the issue with which Imamura is ultimately most
concerned.
     One should note that Imamura's camerawork both raises the sense of
watching through a window and also conveys a sense of the animals -- actually
legendary gods through the film's identification of divinity with nature -- as
the ones doing the watching.  What the film's title, content, and structure
emphatically exclude is the possibility of equating the film's "gods" with the
film's audience.  It would be smug and arrogant to assume that the film's
viewers are meant to be gods.  Because Imamura's camera often switches focus
from the human characters to the animals and back again, it is clear that the
camera's field of view does not singlemindedly represent any one particular
perspective.  And even if it were Imamura's intention to make viewers into
gods, so to speak, the viewer-gods would be necessarily impotent and
ineffective, since the viewer is at the mercy of Imamura's cinematic and
narrative judgment.
     To the other hand, one could conclude that the film is little more than an
indulgent effort to equate the real god back to Imamura himself.  While Imamura
has played similar tricks in his other films -- most notably in his 1967 film
NINGEN JOHATSU (A MAN VANISHES) where Imamura surreptitiously photographed a
woman who is searching for her missing fiance and who falls in love with the
fake interviewer-investigator Imamura paid to accompany her -- there is no such
sense of egotism in KAMIGAMI NO FUKAKI YOKUBO because Imamura never calls undue
attention to his camera tricks.  He also does not carry anything to gratuitous
extremes.  Imamura is certainly fascinated by the dirty laundry of humankind,
and it is therefore only natural that he would be attracted to the themes of
incest and lecherous gods that Kuragejima has to offer.  But in this film at
least, Imamura wants to examine and learn from those themes, not exploit or
revel in them.
     The abrupt epilogue of the film somewhat disrupts the flow of the film,
but it does effectively address how these concerns have changed the community
five years after the main events of the film.  Kariya, the engineer, returns
with his family to visit, as does Kametaro, who has become disillusioned with
life in Tokyo.  Although western influences have transformed the island
(Coca-Cola signs are everywhere), new indigenous legends are also emerging.
Imamura implies that such folklore will always find resources to survive in the
face of encroaching realities.  What is most striking, though, is how strange
and foreign the visitors seem on the island.  Not having witnessed the events
that led to the creation of the new myths, the visitors will never consider the
rock named after the now-deceased Toriko to be anything more than a curiosity.
Kametaro is best qualified among the visitors to realize the full import of the
changes, and it is therefore appropriate that he is the only one who sees a
vision of Toriko dancing on the train tracks ahead of the locomotive pulling
Kariya's train.  This is a rather clumsy method, but Imamura makes his point:
Kametaro (and the audience) are well on their way to realizing that the story
of Toriko has now become intimately anchored within the village's traditions
and collective mythology -- just as a large rock hurled onto the island became
a part of the local lore twenty years earlier.
     Imamura is in this film concerned with the symbiotic relationship among
individual humans in a primitive society, as well as the dynamic tensions
between civilization and mythology.  He has managed to explore the relatively
isolated world of Kuragejima with both his and the residents' integrity intact.
Not once does Imamura patronize the villagers.  And his filmmaking is near the
height of perfection.  Imamura's documentary-style footage is in fact decidely
manipulative, but it is also disarmingly laidback and easygoing enough that
that neither the narrative impact nor the cinematic illusion (except during the
epilogue) is ever lost.  KAMIGAMI NO FUKAKI YOKUBO is another of Imamura's
excellent films, one that has endured two decades of obscurity in this country.
The full length version will undoubtedly transform that situation for the
better.
   [English title in brackets.  FD=Feature Documentary.]
     Shohei Imamura was born in patrician circles, but he quickly rebelled
against his upbringing.  After a stint in theater at Waseda University, he
first joined the Shochiku company's Ofuna Studios, working as an assistant
director to Yasujiro Ozu and others.  However, he longed to leave the studio
because it and Ozu embodied a view toward tradition and family that Imamura
emphatically rejected.  He joined the Nikkatsu studio, which was revived in the
mid-1950s.  In 1975, Imamura declared, "I wouldn't just say I wasn't influenced
by Ozu.  I would say I didn't want to be influenced by him."
(*) The running times of these films may not reflect the film's original
length.  According to Audie Bock of East-West Classics, Japanese distributors
routinely cut films to approximately 2 hours and 20 minutes when shipping them
to the United States.

Title
Review for Moine et la sorcičre, Le (1987)
Cast: Tcheky Karyo, Christine Boisson, Jean Carmet, Raoul Billerey, Catherine
Frot, Feodor Atkine, Maria de Medeiros, Gilette Barbier, Nicole Felix, Jean
Daste, Mathieu Schiffman, Michel Karyo, Joelle Bernier.
Credits: Directed by Suzanne Schiffman.  Produced by Pamela Berger, Annie
Leibovici, and George Reinhart.  Executive Producers: Vincent Malle and Martine
Marignac.  Story by Pamela Berger.  Screenplay by Pamela Berger and Suzanne
Schiffman.  Cinematographer: Patrick Blossier.  Art Director: Bernard Vezat.
Costume Designers: Mouchi Houblinne and Francoise Autran.  Edited by Martine
Barraque.  Music by Michel Portal.
     LE MOINE ET LA SORCIERE is a film that marks the directing debut of
Suzanne Schiffman, who has worked for more than two decades with Francois
Truffaut and othjer French directors like Jacques Rivette and Jean-Luc Godard.
Based on actual historical records, the film tells the story of a 13th century
Dominican friar named Etienne de Bourbon (Tcheky Karyo) searching for heresy in
a small French village.  There he finds a woman named Elda (Christine Boisson)
who lives in the forest and uses her intuitive understanding of nature's
secrets to prepare remedies from flowers, herbs, and leaves.  In his role as
religious inquisitor, Etienne investigates the rites he witnesses and thereby
sets the stage for the conflict in the film.
     The film begins to recreate the day to day life of the villagers from the
moment Etienne first arrives in the village.  He walks past villagers tilling
in the fields and watches them doing their household chores.  Schiffman and her
cinematographer, Patrick Blossier, have shot these scenes in subdued autumnal
hues that are quite beautiful, especially in the forest scenes.  Except for
some overly bright lighting during nighttime scenes, the film captures the
ambiance of peasant life in a manner that rivals the opening scenes of Norman
Jewison's FIDDLER ON THE ROOF.  And just as that film celebrates the spirit of
good-hearted peasant life, so too the villagers in this film live a
refreshingly simple and intuitive lifestyle.  The film takes a decidedly
positive view of peasants compared to Bertrand Tavernier's recent LA PASSION
BEATRICE or John Boorman's EXCALIBUR, where they are little more than chattel
for the nobility to play with as they please.
     But their life is not all peaches and cream.  When the local landlord
(Feodor Atkine) builds a dike to flood the farmland allocated to the villagers,
the peasants demonstrate their bravado when Martin (Mathieu Schiffman) destroys
the dam to clear the peasants' land.  Then, as the vengeful landlord tries to
starve Martin to death by locking him in a tower, Martin's wife Cecile
(Catherine Frot) outwits the guards by nursing Martin at her breast every time
she visits him.  She also hides strands of rope for Martin's escape in her
clothing, and the guards, who search her only to grope her body, never suspect
a thing.  
     It is against this backdrop that Etienne goes about searching for heresy.
He seems to be the epitome of unrelenting discipline, especially when compared
to the easy-going Cure (the local village priest).  Etienne walks stiffly,
fasts often, and demands the cooperation of the villagers.  The Cure regularly
assures him that there is no heresy in the village, but Etienne is not
satisfied until he looks for himself.
     He does not find any sign of heresy until late one night when he witnesses
a strange rite that Elda conducts involving the worship of a certain
St. Guinefort at the base of an elder tree while a wolf visits the proceedings.
His suspicions strongly aroused, Etienne becomes firmly convinced of Elda's
guilt when he later discovers that St. Guinefort is not a man but a greyhound
venerated by the peasants as a protector of babies.  Etienne charges Elda with
sorcery, orders the elder tree destroyed, and sentences Elda to death for her
sins.
     By portraying Etienne so heavy-handedly, the film ultimately paints its
narrative into a corner.  Etienne is so single-minded that it becomes easy to
dismiss his search for heresy as the work of a fanatical inquisitor that has no
relevance to the present.  What's worse, the viewer's realization that the
elder tree does in fact have medicinal chemicals in it completely undermines
what little validity Etienne's charge of sorcery had to begin with.  It
therefore comes as no great surprise to modern audiences that Etienne rescinds
Elda's death sentence (although he does so for a different reason than one
would expect.)
     This narrative fault can be excused since the film is based on the
writings of the real Etienne de Bourbon.  Etienne's texts do not reveal
precisely why he did not burn the forest woman as he would have been expected
to do.  Nor do the writings indicate whether Etienne continued to destroy
heretics afterwards.  The filmmakers, therefore, had to justifiably invoke
artistic license to fill in the gaps.  But the most unusual aspect of Etienne's
story -- which is revealed by the 13th century context -- is not that he
accused the forest woman of heresy, but that he dropped the charges against
her.
     And it is the film's cinematic style that fails to convey this essential
realization to the audience.  Director Schiffman employs long takes and flowing
camera movements while eschewing facial close-ups or montage.  This
mise-en-scene technique works quite well in the subplot of Martin and the dam,
but it also distances the viewer from the thought processes that lead Etienne
to his remarkable and unprecedented decision to free Elda.
     For instance, Schiffman begins the shot where Elda reveals her sad
background to Etienne in a medium close-up of Elda.  Schiffman then slowly pans
the camera backwards until Elda's soliloquy ends in a medium shot of the room,
which links Elda to the context of her dark and confined prison barn.  Both the
narrative content and cinematic style in this scene are intended to show
Etienne's growing realization and sympathy for Elda's position.  But by
excluding Etienne from the camera's field of view during the scene's most
crucial moments, Schiffman places the emphasis entirely on Elda when the film
needs to focus as equally on Etienne as on her.  As Schiffman has shot this and
other scenes, the audience can grasp little of the internal debates Etienne
must have had while deciding that Elda's particular case deserved to be an
exception.  This has the result of transforming the film's central conflict
into a simplistic and trivial clash, rather than bringing to light the hidden
complexities and nuances of the incident.
     These missteps are not fatal, however.  They can be overlooked since this
is Schiffman's first feature as director.  The film does have notable pleasures
in its charming and intriguing portrayal of the peasants and their village
life, and it is most thrilling to know that the filmmakers have taken the pains
to make the portrayals as meticulously accurate as possible.  (Even Michel
Portal's background music seems to have been played on period instruments.)  In
the final analysis, LE MOINE ET LA SORCIERE is a film that is accomplished
enough to inspire high expectations, but it does not quite fulfill those hopes.
One can only lament that the film would have been quite remarkable a
masterpiece had its flaws not been as notable as they are.

Title
Review for Colors (1988)
Cast: Sean Penn, Robert Duvall, Maria Conchita Alonso, Randy Brooks,
Grand Bush, Don Sheadle Gerardo Mejia, Glenn Plummer, Rudy Ramos,
Sy Richardson, Trinidad Silva, Charles Walker, Damon Wayans, Fred Asparagus,
Sherman Augustus, Bruce Beatty, Paula Bellamy, Brandon Bluhm, and many others.
Credits: Directed by Dennis Hopper.  Produced by Robert H. Solo.  Screenplay
by Michael Schiffer.  Story by Michael Schiffer and Richard Dilello.  Director
of Photography: Haskell Wexler, A.S.C. Production Designer: Ron Foreman.
Supervising Film Editor: Robert Estrin, A.C.E.  Music by Herbie Hancock.
Supervising Sound Editor: Ronald Jacobs.  Co-Producer: Paul Lewis.  Costume
Supervisor: Nick Scarano.  Technical Advisors: Dennis Fanning (LAPD), Gerald
Ivory (LA County Probation Dept.), and Roy Nunez (LA County Sheriff's Dept.).
     The name "Dennis Hopper" instantly evokes images of the darker side of
human existence, both in his films and his personal history.  His 1969 film
EASY RIDER captured the country's imagination through its seminal exploration
of alienated youth.  His star waned in 1971 after the flop of his avant-garde
and anti-Hollywood THE LAST MOVIE, and he subsequently became heavily addicted
to drugs.  He burned himself out and ended up walking around nude in the
Mexican desert.  Hopper finally decided to clean up his act in 1983, but he has
remained faithful to his tumultuous roots since his remarkable comeback.  His
acting roles in films like APOCALYPSE NOW, HOOSIERS, and BLUE VELVET have
explored the cult of death, drunkenness, and violent sex.  Last summer's
RIVER'S EDGE again returned him to the biker generation of EASY RIDER.
     Now, eight years after he last directed a film, Hopper has made COLORS,
and it has his name written all over it.  It is about the status of gang
warfare in Los Angeles, where, as the opening titles point out, 250 police
officers have to deal with the violence of 600 gangs with over 70,000 members.
The film gets its name from the colored jackets or headbands members of one
gang wear to distinguish themselves from other gangs as they roam their
designated turfs with Uzi submachine guns and Soviet-made AK-47 assault rifles.
     Sean Penn and Robert Duvall star as two LA Police Department officers
assigned to each others as partners who try to stem the flow of violence and
drugs on their beat.  Duvall plays Bob Hodges, an older and wiser cop on the
verge of retirement who trys to foster enough good will with gang members to
allay their "we vs. them" attitude.  Penn's character is Danny "Pacman"
McGavin, a young rough-and-tumble cop who wants to hit the gangs hard where it
hurts most.  The film explores the dynamic between these two cops as they try
to trace a leader of the "Crips" gang (whose members wear blue) named Rocket
(Don Sheadle), who at the beginning of the film guns down a man wearing the red
colors of the opposing "Bloods" gang.
     During their search for Rocket, Hodges recognizes his own early
hotheadedness in the brash McGavin and trys to channel McGavin's energy in more
constructive directions.  Although Duvall is a far more accomplished actor than
Penn -- whose acting similarly paled next to Timothy Hutton in THE FALCON AND
THE SNOWMAN -- Duvall and Penn manage to somehow create a defiant chemistry.
The dynamic between them comes full circle at the end of the film as McGavin
becomes the one with a new and overzealous partner who needs some experienced
advice.  Unfortunately, this is as deep as the characterization gets, which is
all too typical of films as wrapped in car chases, shootings, and gory deaths
as this one.
     The supporting characters include Maria Conchita Alonso (last seen in THE
RUNNING MAN) in the throw-away role of having to choose between loving McGavin
or being loyal to her fellow Chicanos and gang friends.  Her character is
little more than a token love-interest for Penn, intended, perhaps, to balance
Duvall's wife and kids.  Hopper and scriptwriter Michael Schiffer have no idea
how to integrate women into the machismo of the world they are recreating on
screen, and they would have done themselves and the audience a service had they
excluded Alonso entirely rather than mishandling her character so poorly.
     Haskell Wexler's cinematography (he shot John Sayle's MATEWAN last year)
is excellent as ever.  For COLORS, he used a new high-speed film stock so as
"to move from set-up to set-up ...  without losing momentum."  He also used a
camera known as a "hot head," which is a radio controlled camera mounted on the
arm of a crane that can be manipulated from a distance by the camera operator.
This allows remarkable freedom in cramped quarters, and one scene in the film
demonstrates its capabilities beautifully.  In a crowded jail scene, as two
gang members talk about plans to kill McGavin, the camera slowly pans backwards
over a crowded table around which four other inmates are playing cards.  One of
the cardplayers is eavesdropping on the conversation -- just as Wexler's camera
is eavesdropping on him.  This unification of form and content carries the
viewer inside the scene, and as Wexler points out, "With any traditional camera
system, we'd have needed space for both the crane and the operator.  This way,
the camera wasn't simply an observer," but a participant.
     Herbie Hancock's music is quite different from the slow and somber music
he wrote for ROUND MIDNIGHT.  Here, his music is strong and forceful as it
needs to be during the chase scenes.  Hancock also tries to link the scenes
with Alonso and Penn together with a recurring love theme, but he cannot save
the scenes from their inherent triteness.  The film also uses rock songs, and
especially rap music, in conjunction with the costumes and graffiti-covered
rooms to convey an overriding impression of the squalor afflicting the ghettos.
Except for some overly bright lighting that detracts from this ominous mood,
the other production values are equally topnotch.
     Given Hopper's attraction to the thrill of danger, he decided to shoot the
film in Watts and other sections of Los Angeles where even police officers
hesitate to enter unless they have to investigate serious crimes like murder or
rape.  The gang members Hopper met trusted Hopper implicitly and developed a
remarkably strong rapport with him -- so much so that Hopper actually cast a
few of them in the film as extras.  Much controversy has arisen over this fact
as well as the film's depiction of violence and the gang lifestyle.  It is true
that Hopper's film teeters just to the edge of exploiting the violence, but it
does step back from the brink of gratuity enough to maintain a hold on reality.
     Because Hopper gained the trust of the gangs and worked with them
effectively, he was in a unique position to portray gang life from the inside.
If his primary goal were to call attention to the urban warfare being waged in
Los Angeles, Hopper could have made a documentary or a television special.  He
would have reached a more limited audience that way, but at least he could have
made a serious contribution to the issue.  But Dennis Hopper is not Bill
Moyers.  It is characteristic of Hopper to explore volatile matters in his
films, and it would be foolish to expect a single document or film about gang
warfare to show the remedies to all aspects of gang warfare.
     But what is cause for concern is that Hopper rejects conventional
explanations for the underlying causes of gang warfare.  In one scene, a
community social worker tries to organize residents of the ghetto to help the
police control the gangs.  But as Hopper directs the scene, when the social
worker tries to give some reasons for the existence of gangs -- like poverty
and lack of role models for younger kids -- one man in the audience jumps up
and shouts, "We know all that.  What are you gonna do about it?"  The
get-together quickly degenerates into a shouting match, and no progress is
made.  Hopper cuts to a shot of Hodges sitting in the back of the room with a
bemused expression indicating that he doesn't really expect much from meetings
like this one.  The burden of gang violence remains on the police and
understaffed social workers.
     That leads to the film's attitude toward gangs -- one of utter resignation
to their violence.  The futility of doing more than isolating and limiting gang
violence is the whole point of Hodges' philosophy, and it's the same viewpoint
McGavin adopts by the end of the film.  As for social workers, Hopper shows
them not making much headway either.  In another scene, the same social worker
who spoke to the residents tries to encourage some gang members to straighten
out their lives.  Predictably, he fails, and Hopper uses the moment to
demonstrate the appeal of gangs to youths, such as fulfilling the need for a
sense of identity and belonging.
     The only bit of hope that appears in the film is buried in the character
Frog (Trinidad Silva), who calls everyone "homes" (for "homeboys") and has
developed a cautious but firm understanding with Hodges over the years.  He is
the only one who even trys to protect younger kids like his brother from the
ravages of the ghetto, and therein lies his real relevance to the film.  It
seems obvious that gangs would eventually cease to exist in such large numbers
if teenagers were given more positive alternatives to joining a gang.  The
filmmakers recognize this, since they do include scenes describing how Frog's
younger brother joins Frog's gang.  (McGavin confronts Frog's young brother
while he is defacing a mural.  Despite McGavin's heavy-handed effort -- he
sprays paint in the boy's face -- to deter him, Frog's brother later in the
film endures beatings and humiliation as part of his initiation rites into
Frog's gang.)
     However, this ray of hope is buried by the film's view that the
perpetuation of gangs is inevitable.  And that is what Hopper can be most
justly criticized for.  Not for excluding a Reagan feel-good optimism or for
examining a difficult issue with unflinching eyes, but for infusing the
description of the problem with such an overriding pessimism that it dashes any
hope for a solution.  The film urgently wants to point out how communities are
being raped by gang violence but then comes dangerously close to telling those
in such communities to either move out or bear it because there's no solution.
     That is the real point those who condemn the film ought to focus on,
rather than picketing or calling for boycotts.  Because this film says that the
most police and others can do is limit and restrain gangs, it only contributes
to the myopia of upper and middle class society -- which so far has been
largely left untouched by the violence.  Tackling an issue as complex as the
gang sub-culture would require a massive commitment of funds and human
resources from society and government, and such a commitment so far has not
been forthcoming.  That the film subtly and perhaps unintentionally supports
this state of affairs is far more damaging and alarming than the effect of any
exploitation or glorification in the film's depiction of gangs and their
violence.
     In the final analysis, Hopper's unique persona had led him to a film that
is too close to the reality of violence to be entertaining and too muddled
intellectually to be illuminating.  Perhaps Hopper felt that he had to solidly
demonstrate his directing talents again before tackling bolder and newer
cinematic vistas.  Making COLORS has clearly confirmed the rejuvenation of
Hopper's creative juices, but it is quite disappointing that the film's most
notable success is limited to this accomplishment.
Directorial Filmography of Dennis Hopper:

Title
Review for Maurice (1987)
Cast: James Wilby, Hugh Grant, Rupert Graves, Denholm Elliott, Simon Callow,
      Billie Whitelaw, Ben Kingsley, Judy Parfitt, Phoebe Nicholls, Mark Tandy,
      Helena Mitchell, Kitty Aldridge, Patrick Godfrey, Michael Jenn, and
      Barry Foster.
     There has been much discussion about the film MAURICE and reviews of it.
May I take this opportunity to give my opinions about MAURICE?  I would like to
address both aspects of the quality of the film: as a film itself and secondly
as a film dealing with the very sensitive and important issue of homosexuality.
     As a film, MAURICE is a notable accomplishment, especially as a followup
to the major commercial and artistic success of A ROOM WITH A VIEW.  The
producer/director team of Ismail Merchant and James Ivory did not let their
previous success go to their head.  They set out to adapt Forster's novel to
the screen, and that is what they have done, no more and no less.  Although
their achievement in MAURICE does not equal their success in A ROOM WITH A
VIEW, the film is most certainly worth seeing.
     There are many themes common to both MAURICE and A ROOM WITH A VIEW.  In
both films, the denial of physical and sensual pleasures that characterizes
Edwardian society is portrayed as a major flaw in that society.  Marriage is
depicted as a social contract, an inhibiting force against the true expression
of feelings and happiness.  Societal pressures to conform are intense.
     Both films resolve the conflict with a gentle yet firm repudiation of the
negative pressures society can impose on its members.  The fact that the lovers
in MAURICE are of the same sex does not lessen the strength of their endearing
and true love for each other.  Both films end with a reaffirmation of the
common human bonding that transcends nationality, class, and societal
expectations.  Instead of presenting their views as a polemic, the films
entertain and present thoughts for further contemplation.
     There are differences, too.  In A ROOM WITH A VIEW, Lucy and George only
risk their virtue, whereas in MAURICE, the lovers must risk being disgraced as
well as being imprisoned.  In the first film, the two lovers are re-united
while society and family give their blessing: there is no doubt that the two
will marry and live together happily.  In MAURICE there is a great deal of
uncertainty as to the future (although the joy of the present is clear when
Maurice and Alec meet in the boathouse).  The two men clearly cannot marry
legally, and their relationship will in all probability be forced to continue
hidden from public view.  While A ROOM WITH A VIEW is a humorous comedy of
manners, MAURICE is somewhat darker both in cinematic style and narrative tone.
     My complaint with MAURICE is that in 135 minutes of screen time, we only
get to know the two of the three main characters with any significant depth.
The two are, of course, Maurice and Clive.  These two are portrayed very well,
and we learn a great deal about them and their motivations.  It is Alec that we
don't know as much about.  We learn very little about who he is, what his
background is, and why he loves Maurice as much as he does.  Just exactly why
Alec climbs a ladder up to Maurice's bedroom, apparently on a hunch, is not
immediately clear.  Alec and Maurice had exchanged nothing more than a few
glances.  It's this sort of ambiguity that stops us from fully understanding
Alec, despite however hard we try.
     The other characters (the mothers, Clive's wife, sisters, and the man who
goes to jail for his homosexual activity--sorry, I don't remember his name)
are just there.  We don't know much about them, and therefore we don't care as
much about them.  They just take up screen time.  Most of the time, they are
incidental to the real narrative which is about the relationship of Clive with
Maurice and Maurice with Alec.  Of course, these relationships do not exist in
a vacuum, and therefore Merchant-Ivory, like any other film makers, are forced
to incorporate the supporting characters into the narrative.  Whereas this task
of incorporation was accomplished with great success in A ROOM WITH A VIEW,
MAURICE fails to achieve the same results.  Maurice and Clive are convincing in
their own depth, but the other characters are not nearly as compelling.  This
is the main flaw that prevents me from ranking MAURICE with A ROOM WITH A VIEW.
     However, I should note that my complaint has nothing to do with the fact
that many and perhaps most of the dullest characters are women.  I do not have
any compulsive need to have charming and intelligent women on the screen in
order to make the film's depiction of male homosexuality palatable and
acceptable.  To its inestimable credit, the film does not take that easy escape
route.  (In fact, it may be possible that Merchant-Ivory deliberately
de-emphasized the supporting characters so that viewers would be forced to
concentrate on the relationship between the main characters.  But that purpose
could have been far better accomplished in many other ways.)  My complaint is
based on the rather unsuccessful portrayal and integration of Alec and the
supporting characters, period.  Whether those characters are male or female is
irrelevant to my complaint.
     So that's how I feel about MAURICE as a film, per se.  But the very fact
that the film has been made and distributed so widely is important in of
itself.  The film does not exist solely as a film in a bubble of its own.  I
can judge the film as a film, but I would be negating the tremendous social
value and importance of the film if I were to do only that.  While I can debate
its merits as a film critic, it is impossible to deny that I am a also member
of the human race and a product of Western society.  MAURICE forces me to make
that acknowledgement and to act on it rather than focus exclusively on my
skills as a film reviewer.
     I cannot forget the muted squeals of excitement and joy an elderly man
sitting in front of me uttered whenever a love scene occurred between Maurice
and Alec.  I don't know if that man was gay or not as I consider it rude and
completely inappropriate to ask a total stranger about his sexual orientation.
But that man's emotions were just as genuine as Maurice's love for Clive and
later Alec.  It was clear that he was overjoyed at seeing two men engaging in
sensual acts in a major film released in the United States.  The power of
MAURICE in that regard simply cannot be denied or denigrated.
     As Mario Prats on the net so movingly wrote, the film evokes the classic
dilemma of being forced to subvert one's innermost desires for societal gain
and acceptance.  The societal and religious pressures that Clive succumbs to
are tremendously strong and still in existence today.  The simple act of seeing
a positive depiction in a mainstream film of love and joy in a homosexual
relationship is a powerful negation of incessant reminders and warnings from
religious fundamentalists and society at large that homosexuality is considered
immoral and wrong.  MAURICE succeeds in negating that pernicious societal view,
and it is that success which delighted that kindly old man.
     MAURICE is not a great film, but it is a good one.  If Alec's motivations
had been more fully explored, perhaps the full potential of the film's power to
touch viewers with its humanity and sensitivity would have been realized.  And
perhaps that would have helped even more to increase the number of individuals
sympathetic to the lesbian and gay community.  Some members of that community
may not want the help and/or sympathy of the larger (and therefore dominant)
heterosexual group.  But I would submit that we do have only one world to live
in, and I for one feel that a world based on mutual love, understanding, and
tolerance is far more preferable than one based on fearful isolation and bitter
divisions.
     MAURICE is not a belated or reluctant attempt to welcome unobtrusive and
docile gays and lesbians to society's living room of guarded acceptance.
Rather, it is an affirmation, a celebration, an intelligent presentation of the
strengths, hopes, fears, desires, and problems of homosexuals in Edwardian
society and (by extension) our own society of today.  MAURICE has done its part
to give the homosexual community the attention it deserves.  That great
achievement, coupled with its cinematic excellence, makes it a very significant
film and one well worth seeing.
     Director James Ivory and producer Ismail Merchant created Merchant-Ivory
Productions way back in 1963, and the two have been making films together
since.  James Ivory studied under and was influenced by the great Indian
director Satyjit Ray.  Frequently, they have collaborated with Ruth Prawer
Jhabvala in the preparation of their scripts.  Merchant-Ivory's films are known
for viewing English society in a particularly picturesque manner.  Their most
successful film so far has been last year's A ROOM WITH A VIEW, which won
Oscars for Best Art Direction, Costume Design, and Best Adapted Screenplay.
